Can you give a reference for this. I don't believe that is true, i.e., constitution limits how congress can tax. 
I have this and it works well.
I like Ron Paul, but I wish the guy would wear some regular shoes. I guess they're probably more comfortable, and I'm glad they're not Velcro, but he looks like some sort of public transportation crackpot wearing those things. 
To produce what we currently produce using the methods you are advocating will take more land than is currently devoted to agriculture. Where does that come from?  Keeping people out of political positions doesn't magically produce land does it? 
This was shockingly coincidental, but I squirted for the first time about 2 hours after writing that last comment. It was nice, but a weird feeling. Like, something I'll get used to in time but a little unexpected.  We're going to try to do it again tonight.
[Pandering](http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/pandering) is the wrong word to use here.
They already fixed the problem. They "were" tight clothes. The only reason you realized there was a problem was because it was conspicuous in its absence.
Exactly, the complexity is much more visible in professional sports. You have to understand that his trainers and managers are also concerned about his long term productivity - Morneau is signed to a major contract, they can't risk his long term productivity versus short term return.
Do you still trust him? Hard to be mad when he drops a metric ton of cash on you I'll give you that. When he told you were you pissed or happy and did you even believe him at first?
I was hoping the thread would devolve into something like sheep go to heaven.
&gt; No one is glorying in Ah Ha  You're not from Europe, are you?
For once, Step 3 is actually rather clear.
Your victory is thorough and devastating sire.
You're missing the point here. This is NOT a smoking gun leading us all to the ground-breaking discovery that we are not alone in the universe. It's meat tenderizer man. Just recently we heard a (most likely) made up story of aliens turning off some of our nukes, now the "scientists" are trying to show us -in baby steps, mind you- that we are not unique and life abounds.  Planets like ours are almost everywhere.   it all leads to Aliens-2012.  I, Scrambley, here by throw my Hat into The Ring and delare myself in the running for UN Alien Ambassador.   If you want my qualifications for the job, here ya go: Picard&gt;Kirk YAY! VOTE FOR ME! YAY!
Hey, I bet the guy with the avatar tats ALL over his back has one already
All groups are legitimately tax-exempt.  Fuck what you think.
I think she looks like the smell of a three week dead hooker.
I know we are having a personal discussion through e-mail right now too, but you should REALLY consider carrying liquids too. Expecting people to just toss cartridges after one use kinda sucks.  But for you guys considering where to buy, everything I have researched shows Glow Fine has EXCELLENT quality stuff, a great upgraded version of a 510.
I usually just say "I want to get lost" and always add torches on the left.  Then I find holes in the ground that go lower and I just end up screwing myself.
I like this idea
Learn you some scales and basic music theory.
So, instead of about half of people being like this, your saying, everyone's like this? Now I feel much better.
More like LAME-ular LAME-lence.
Oh, yeah. That doesn't look shopped at all. But oh man, ideas ideas for my future childs.
This this this this!
As a Titans fan, I'm lucky if I see them win one Super Bowl within my lifetime. I wouldn't want that to be tarnished if we won due to weather conditions. I want the elements to be completely fair. That way, there can be no real debate that they won on their own terms.
Never played it, but always heard good things. Particularly from X-play back in the day. Seeing the picture of the main character there, is anyone else reminded of Alex from Halflife 2?
That Belichick one is brilliant.
OMG. Next they'll want to ban oral sex!
For some people there is no hope. These folks *want* to believe.  They really do.
"you can have your cake and eat it too" ?  "In Soviet Russia the cake eats you"  ?  "Simon found the last perversion known to man, cake sex"  ? 
Big, easy to read screen with shortcuts to navigation and stuff. It's only for use when mounted in a car dock, such as the suction cup one they sell for the Droid.
listen up, SCW, you don't have to feel like you're just a stupid douche who doesn't get the MOST OBVIOUS jokes!  Sadly, we are alike.  You do not get this joke.  I do not get this joke.  Therefore, this joke fails at being relevent.
Yep. He told me that if I didn't get help he would leave. He's a keeper, so I did. Plus, I think half the time women in my position don't understand how much their actions hurt others.
[once more, with feeling](http://www.reddit.com/r/scifi/comments/ccie2/decline_and_fall_of_scifi_on_television_or_why_i/c0rmkiz)
It also looks like the Little Sister's ADAM gathering implement...
&gt;So the other fella has a moral obligation to someone he has never even met? Noooo, he has a moral obligation to his wife.
Thank you! I found this a few years ago and haven't been able to find it since. Crazy new positions, ahoy!
I know, righ? I was trying to explain to them about the difference between bosons and fermions, and why you need a particular isotope of helium to pull it off, and its relationship to superconductivity, and all I got was blank stares.  Also, you misspelled superfluidity.
I don't know if it's because of ADD or not but my son has been great at patterns pretty much from birth. I don't know if I'd say that he's hard to surprise but he certainly doesn't react to surprises like a normal child most of the time.
IT'S A TRAP!
He is a PIMP
her*   But honestly I will probably never start smoking weed. I need a job and THC doesn't look good on a UA (I think it should be legal, but I'm not the government, so yeah).   It's not worth it to me especially since I don't get high from it. I've smoked a lot and never felt any effect significant enough to risk losing a job over. 
I already have level 100 sandwich making skills.
In New York City, we call it "the star".
Yes. Taking the date is bad. The phone gives him a quick way out, which is *much* less awkward than sitting across from someone and doing at the...beginning? End? In the middle? Do you stay? Leave immediately? Did someone at the next table just hear him get shot down in flames? bleh, no fun. 
No, he despises his respect for trademark law.  Don't start interpreting.  I mean, Jesus newacc0unt,  act like you been here before.
hell yeah man, [Into the Stream](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Wq--g0itCEg) does it for me.
Hey, maybe a great reason for the `Accept` header! Store both JPG and WebP versions, server hands off WebP to browsers via the `Accept: image/webp,image/*` header and JPG otherwise.
Repoman "let's go eat sushi and not pay for it."
cool, but old post is old
I think they created a [subreddit](http://reddit.com/r/dae) just because of this phenomenon.
"Is this a joke?"
I've used Endomondo and CardioTrainer. Both worked really well for me.
That....was this post? Is this a trolling attempt or you just being oblivious?
"Well if there's no god, what happens when we die? If there isn't a god, that would like suck."
50-60 dollars a week (including all non-grocery supplies, 30-40 on food), I make all my own meals and haven't eaten out in 4+ years.  I buy mostly beef, tuna, brown rice, green peppers, onions and jalapenos.
And then you get no security updates.  IE is the only browser that supports older versions for years after the newer version came out.  The other browsers require you to upgrade version pretty quickly once the new one comes out.  And even if they do support the old version for security, it most likely will only be for things equally broke in the new version.  There isn't going to be any real support.  Unlike microsoft with IE.  And you don't have to like this reality.  I am just letting you know why businesses like microsoft.
Weird to see complete lack of AA. One viking would have paid for itself in a second. Some kind of respect thing going on?
You can blame Minecraft too!
atdhe.net for all your streaming needs
You just need to verify your email address. Once you do this you can write more comments and submit more links. That's your only problem.
All these demos, hype and waiting have served mostly to prove to me that I don't actually have a problem with my X3. Hell, I didn't have a problem with my old Pod 2.0. I think this revelation is going to save me a lot of money.
Seriously? Is that in the TOS?
The analogy is better if you make out the purchase to be a retirement account, intended only for subsistence living. And then, instead of simply spending the cash on beer, you borrowed against your retirement account to fund buying guns for your "adventures" with the local militia group. Along the way, you keep making interest payments to your retirement accounts for IOU's, but those interest payments are all you can really afford, and you reach a point where there's no money for your fun on the weekends playing war with your buddies in the woods. So your Asian neighbor lends you the money to keep doing that.   The distinction between the Social Security fund and the general fund of the nation is important. Just because that money leaves your check at the same time as your taxes doesn't mean that it's the same thing as your taxes. 
Have you read Vonnegut's _Cat's Cradle_?  I always thought that was the best defence of religion - a religion that was declared false by it's own prophet, and defended by an atheist.  &gt; "Anyone unable to understand how a useful religion can be founded on lies won't understand this book either."  =)
&gt; useful website  This is a subjective term, not all of us find FB useful...
Thanks.  Post pictures and harvest the karma!
You've heard of lesbians, right?
turning water into sake is much more impressive imo...
Americans love their televisions. The Deciders most definitely want lots and lots of Americans watching television. It's their number one tool to keep the citizens ignorant, uninformed, and most importantly, distracted.  If the citizens aren't happy with their television, they just might stop watching. Once that happens, there is a very good chance their IQ and self awareness will increase. The Deciders cannot allow that.  So TV is in fact a big issue.  * The Economy is just fine. The Deciders are rich. * Foreign Policy is just fine. Israel is ok. Fuck the rest of the world. * The Environment is just fine. The Deciders have climate controlled limousines. * Education is just fine. The Deciders kids don't go to public school. * Health Care is just fine. The Deciders receive the best health care on the planet. * National Security is just fine. The Deciders have armed bodyguards. * Agriculture is just fine. The Deciders have personal chefs. * Personal Freedom is just fine. The Deciders write the laws but don't have to follow them. * Immigration is just fine. The Deciders need brown people to scrub piss stains off their shower. * The Justice System is just fine. The Deciders are never held accountable.  [Edit: Thought of a few more *factual* bullet points. This list could go on and on]
[It's about making money.](http://www.reddit.com/r/scifi/comments/ccie2/decline_and_fall_of_scifi_on_television_or_why_i/c0rmkiz)
I am a 14 year old girl.   It's gross how much Axe the guys in my grade use.   Their locker room is a cologne filled nightmare. 
Wow this is awesome. Allies like you can really make a big difference in the world by just being vocal about your support. Thank you so much for doing this. 
I don't delude myself, I just drink blended scotch on the rocks.
"ooh, that will be very helpful." Said last century. 
Gay implies more than one participant.
YES I GET THIS TOO!  It's never progressed to anything serious, but it can ruin a meal.  Oddly enough I don't get it with baby Japanese eggplant. I only get the tingly bitter mouth with larger varieties of eggplant.
Sure this one might not have life in it but it means that due to the laws of probability there have to be thousands, if not millions, of hospitable planets in our galaxy, which in turn means that in a lot of them there has to be some kind of life form.
Eat American food, problem solved. You won't lose weight though.
Jesus. Thanks for the warning.
They may be human beings, but I have a feeling they're still bots.
So I take it that you're from Detroit?
That's just a documentary receipt for tax purposes (they *always* find a way to write off their extravagances).   The real tab is kept as a souvenir. It's usually tattooed on the ass of a virgin, fresh off the boat from Sicily. 
Yo, man. That dish soap sucks. I will never buy the cheapest dish soap again.
Well, thanks for the flowers. And back at ya.
Open his thighs  Look up to the skies  To peeeeeeeeee  I'm just big boned,   I need no sympathy.
Fuck, you're right.  Just one question: Did we do anything at all better than the projection?
i has been approved BUT when our representatives decided this, a lot of them didn't have all the information because the people behind this project held serious data and advisory opinions back. so in our opinion it's not approved.
Are you 17yrs old?  When you say "recovered" what does it mean.  How did you work on it.  Do you still show any "craziness" you mentioned above?
They are, i just hate exploring them, haha.
What politics of Michael Moore's do you not like?
&gt;the mother is in a better place  No, asshole, the Mother is **dead**. **Dead**. There is no *better place*. She was destroyed.  The son had his throat slashed by a fucking maniac, and will probably be mentally fucked up for the rest of his life.  THANK GOD! ALL MERCIFUL GOD!  Moron.
&gt;I will spit right in your fucking face &gt;How does it taste   &gt;After the lips are sealed below your waist   &gt;You will never fuck again   - Whitechapel
So this joy that can be gained from this finite, born-into-sin, corrupted, influenced-by-the-devil, impure life is more important than the difference between an ETERNITY of heaven or an ETERNITY of hell. 
or japan, or both
Even if it means regicide.
Sorry, should have said "[halfway house](http://www.answers.com/topic/halfway-house)"
please, tell us something we don't know.  Canadian's know we are getting royally fucked by our telecom and media companies.  Yet the CRTC does NOTHING to protect us, and just adds more shit to the fire by ignoring the people and doing whatever Bell, Telus, Rogers et al tell them to do.
Actually, he's probably only paying capital gains tax, which -- if it's on an asset he's held for more than a year -- is only 15% federally.
As said above, &gt; My PC broke.  I'm using a laptop nowadays.
fresh fruits and vegetables- apples, grapes, orange, banana, peas, broccoli, pumpkin, stuff like that.   additional pic - hanging out outside http://s171.photobucket.com/albums/u311/jm_willer/wally/?action=view&amp;current=IMG_5224Medium.jpg
I think you'll find that your remote control is always *remotely located* between the sofa cushions.
"Proof in the scientific sense" is only valid for repeatable experiments, assuming you mean the Scientific Method.  As for "God showing himself on camera," you are essentially saying, "The only way I can have faith is if there's no more faith to be had."  But in the end, I firmly believe that there *is* proof all around us. Logical proof, historical proof, and for me, experiential proof. The debate has been going on for 2000 years and neither you nor I are in unique positions. I don't know what else I can say. :o
My theory on the FF7 hate, is because Cloud was a very popular character but he was a whiny bitch (for very good reasons)  Now, it seems that every jRPG character is a whiny bitch and it is Clouds fault because he started the trend, therefore FF7 sucks.
I would so wear this!  
 ಠ_**ಠ**
YUM! I definitely agree. Food is a very compelling argument.   Gets me every time.
That's it. Nothing else will make this night better. Goodnight.
hah fair nuff :}
I'm pretty sure this is actually how the Cloverfield monster was brought up from the bottom of the ocean.
I can't imagine how awesome it would've been to see [these guys](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=twuzki0ZpDo) in a small pub (like they must've done before they were famous).
Peter Wiggin is just a karma whore... it all makes sense now!
That's why I share my bag with a midget. I eat the top half and give him the bottom.
HOLYSHITHOLYSHITHOLYSHIT
Not content. This is boring and doesn't add anything to the world. Links like this are ruining reddit.  Downvoted.
NXT Season 3 was the funniest show I've ever watched.
it's kinda funny that on one hand, their training scenario is dismissed as completely fictitious, and on the other hand the media is shouting that we need to cower in the corner because "al qaeda" is planning small-group "mumbai" terror attacks on the U.S. 
I read that page.... I really don't like his writing style. Now let me tell you; Now yeah, that's now my now opi-now-nion
retrograde orbit. no moon, so no techtonic plate movement hence no carbon cycle, so excess free CO2 and SO2 in the atmosphere.  result a hellhole.
parking garage... best one night stand ever
Dylan? Dylan who?
Croc ate the dingo.
I like Firefly but it has to be the most overrated TV show in history at this point. 
I do the opposite, I try to eat everything proportionally so that at any point I will still have some of everything available to me. The only exception is the last "round" of "bites," where I generally save what I like most or what I feel would be a good "ending" for last.  Or I try to get some of everything in every bite (depends on what I'm eating). In your example for every bite I would probably cut off a piece of steak, get some potatoes, stick some peas/greenbeans to the potatoes and then stab the piece of steak and eat it all.
I know what you mean, to me he stands shoulders above any other boy band member of all time.  Especially now with his acting career coming on he's establishing himself as Mr Versatile.  I can't wait to see his performance in The Social Network.
Nice try, Steve Jobs!
The first time I came across the concept was in Season 1, Episode 26 of X-Men Evolution, entitled "Shadow Dance."  But, Nightcrawler's father, Azazel, was introduced in Uncanny X-Men #428, and is a member of an evil race of mutants who were banished into that other dimension by a race of angelic mutants.  This group of mutants, the Neyaphem, are introduced in UXM #429.
I'll give you Ze Goggles for your rubber glove. 
Hahah lol awesome spot! i had a fake id from Wisconsin! 
FF6 - [Ultros Boogie](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mocwUrcDx6E) - Waking your heart all over again
Yep, never need much lawyering...  I'm kinda getting there though.  My need will be minimal though.  Im basically just looking for rock solid asset protection with a holding company.  Now that I actually have a few small assets worth protecting!  Only took 15 years lol :&gt;)
Just pick a few guys you find interesting, chat em up a bit. It's a start. I've made a few friends doing that with some females on the internet.
Kansas City to Ottumwa is just over 200 miles, hardly "across the country".
So far from me, the only good seems to be hex tiles and the general combat system, although I'm not completely sold on either ranged (how many miles away are archers supposed to be able to fire?) or unit stacks (one single military unit in an area the size of a major city? really? maybe a limit higher than one but less than infinite would be better).  To be honest it feels glossier and cheaper, with less depth.  I have not been sucked into a single game yet, I've had to force gameplay through.  I feel like I wasted $50, and if there was a chance of a refund I would take it.
Either that or Howlin' For You.
No one gave him that job. He chose it. He may not have had many choices, but it was still his decision to take that job.  And yes, that job or no job is a choice. No one who works for a telemarketing company is exempt from this kind of harassment in my opinion.
This saddens me that some people on the internet are so critical that you actually went out of your way to clarify that that was indeed your opinion since someone would've come along and been like "herp derp you're wrong I've seen funnier"
I was talking to a man that identified as gay and he was saying that he never met a woman he was attracted to, but if the right opportunity were to present herself, he would give it a shot. He didn't mean he would turn straight, just enjoy a hot heterosexual escapade with the right woman at the right time.  Not such a surprise. Women that identify as lesbian have said similar things.  So why don't straight people have the courage to admit the same? Aren't I brave?  So it stuck with me...and I keep wondering what my perfect guy would be, since I'm a straight male. What I would do if the perfect situation presented itself.   And then, inevitably, I recall how pretty much all straight women regard bisexual males: like a bloody herpe smeared with HIV, on a good day.  Yeah, no thanks. Too bad, Justin Timberlake. My apologies, Dr. Colbert. I'll stick with my rigidly predetermined sexuality. Guess I'm more scared of not getting pussy than I am aroused by dudes? lol
Thanks for pointing this out; been a follower of their website / campaign for some time and didn't realize that. Glenn is a fucking badass. 
Glad to help!  Enjoy your new place!
Thanks for the link! I'll try to reproduce that pylon placement next time.  I'll give Gateway-first a go. I definitely wish every time that I had faster Warp Gate tech. But the accelerated expansion does make life a lot easier. I find that I can overcome pressure by throwing money at the problem.
yes, but I was responding to your direct statement "this number is prime, this number is prime.." etc etc.
Much as I would love NBA jam I'm not buying that abortion of a game just to get it.. 2k11!!  edit: ok a seperate release works.. good move EA!
At least you have the second best air case on the market imho. Only thing better is the HAX X and that costs almost 100 more than you payed for that red 932.
http://www.edenfantasys.com/sex-toy-reviews/  There's a lovely community centered around reviewing sex toys/accessories. From video reviews, to text reviews, ratings, and easy ways to search for products by type or brand.  Personally I'm a fan of Lelo. They're a great company with quality products. The Hitachi Magic Wand is a solid choice, although can be too strong for some. Also, I'd advise checking Amazon, as they surprisingly have some great prices for sex toys.
why do people think 50 Cent's tweets are funny? 
That's why I've always said the Greek mythology makes more sense than the Christian one.  In the Greek narrative, there are hundreds of gods and demi-gods, inexplicable creatures, and forces more powerful than the gods. They have mood swings, fight, commit random acts of butchery to win a bet, and do everything humans do.  It doesn't really explain anything, but using objective measurements, that story makes a lot more sense.  Edit: You have my sympathy on the possum. I know what it's like to see something in such agony, and there's not a lot anyone can do. It's not like there are baby possum doctors to give him a tiny wheelchair.
I'm excited about the gloves of running urgently (as a medic). I feel like the heavy is only brought out for speed denial now. :(
If you're in need of an e-bound, send me a PM ;)
That's basically what Netflix and the Canadians are obliging me to do.  Cunts.
The random drops are so infrequent that it is still a big advantage to buy the hat to get the bonus.
OMG, do they have a name for someone who wins a debate by saying something so amazingly stupid that it leaves the opponents speechless leaving the audience to think that they've been beat? Do people really think that raising taxes on the rich can help the economy? 
I didn't realize Valve is forcing you to buy it. How odd that they give it away for free in the drop system.
Which girl is in your class? The ex or the V-card one?
This is why I upload crap photos to Facebook to appease my friends and share memories, but anything I'm remotely proud of stays the fuck away from there.
A friend Stumbled it to me lastnight and I went through the whole thing. It's definitely worth the strouble.
I've been a fan of ryan's for years and I love this cover
Its also a little disingenuous to say that people knew life needed sunlight.  They knew that light needed an energy source, and they thought that the only available energy source was the sun.   Geothermal vents proved them wrong, but the fundamental idea was still correct.  The thinking with water is that life needs a wide range of chemical reactions to function, those reactions require some kind of solvent and the other solvents we could swap out for water all have drawbacks when compared to water.  So while water may not be a necessity for life, it is much, much more difficult to see how it would arise.
Each of the class is different; only one I have experience with is the klonopin.  Are you currently mixing them with the booze?  Also, why doesnt your area have public detoxes you can go to?
Frontal approach, my friend!
nope.  missed it by a mile
Yeah I do the same thing when I see an oncoming tractor trailor. "What if I just pulled the steering wheel slightly to the left?". It's almost tempting
I paid 35% on the earned income, the $100,000.  Then I invested that money--I used it to buy stock. That $100,000 is my [cost basis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cost_basis) in the stock.  When I sell the stock, for $ *X*, I don't pay income taxes on all of *X*, *that would be double taxation*.  I pay income tax on *X* minus my cost basis (*X* - 100,000).  I pay income tax only on the net income.  (*X* - 100,000). I think you may be thinking of the concept of double taxation of distributed corporate earnings.  Corporations are taxed on their net income. Then, when the corporation distributes the income to its shareholders as, for example, dividends, that distribution becomes income for the individual shareholder. The individual shareholders then pays income tax on the dividends (the distributed earnings). This is double taxation.  But when you think about it, all money is double, triple, x-tupple taxed.  When you earn a $100 bill, it is taxed as income.  When you use that same $100 that you paid income tax on to pay the barber, he earns income and he pays tax on it, etc.   Favoring capital over labor is a fundamental parameter in capitalist society. It's why we bail out banks but not debtors. It's why saving Wall Street is so important, but funding school lunches and paying teachers a respectable wage is not. Don't get me wrong. I am a capitalist myself. It may not be the greatest show on earth but its the only game in town. Let's just be honest. 
Check out the book [The Columbian Exchange](http://www.amazon.com/Columbian-Exchange-Biological-Consequences-Contributions/dp/0837172284/ref=sr_1_3?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1285890848&amp;sr=1-3) by Alfred Crosby. The discovery of the New World did create somewhat of a theological crisis for the Europeans. It changed the Western way of conceiving the globe; it forcefully challenged its theology. Some thought that the Native Americans were incapable of being Christians.
I just lost about seven diamonds (one fresh pickaxe and four I found on that same mining trip) after digging outward and upward and sending a plume of lava right into my strip mine. I feel like I should be more upset, but I have about 30 more diamond at my base and I really only use it for pickaxes.  Oh, and "O! Cruel fate!" isn't a bad punchline for a ragecomic of sorts :).
It sounds like something Douglas Adams would do.
Dead social construct would mean it is no longer in use.  No longer useful.  Like Sanskrit.  Dying social construct would make more sense.
Run? I pulled out and hid my wang with a cushion.   Because obviously a cushion would blind his eyes to what was going on, right? 
I don't pretend to know everything, but I'm definitely guilty of having done free work in the past, and way undercharging people I know who ask for stuff. Thing was, my school, like many schools, required I do an internship. Being in a town of only about 30,000 with three 4 year schools and a couple 2 year county/city colleges, the majority of businesses in the area expect to have X amount of students desperate to do free work for them each year.  I've graduated now, been screwed over a few times, and don't plan on doing free work for the sake of experience ever again.
That is often the intended design, in order to save the passengers.  The poles must be strong enough to withstand heavy winds and stuff, but weak enough to break when hit by a car.
Cliche!!  I mean....touche!!
Winner. Guess it was too easy.
Also keep in mind that next gen of some component is always "right around the corner". Pick something that is one of the more expensive parts (like processors as nubbinator suggested) and wait for that one. Then go all out. You shouldn't wait more than 6 months though.
Great job ;D
I'm seriously in tears from laughter here. And his face at 1:51 when the guy says "Hey!". Oh man. This is too good.
until we have robots to load that stuff in bins in airtight environs, at the end of the day we're looking at the exact same tasks that need to be performed, whether it be a remodel or a demolition/raze.
I haven't seen it in years but I haven't heard anything good about it
I voted for Ron Paul.  When I tell people that, all I get is "Wow!  Why did you waste your vote?"  You can't win if you don't vote "correctly".
i actually read that special shoes are more of a marketing thing... just like you say. pronation and such. thank you for the link!
I am so happy...I've honestly never heard one of this kid's songs. All I had to see was some of the lyrics posted by some Redditors and that haircut and I knew I'd stay clean forever.  Also, how many teenage girls on are Reddit? The fact this is getting *any* downvotes is beyond me.
No offense, but isn't a lot of what you say basically just a result of the race and socioeconomic class of the players? A high percentage of American NBA players are poor black kids from the hood. Same with the NFL. In contrast, most American MLB players are white and relatively middle class. By your logic, the NHL is the best professional league, because the athletes are mainly white guys who act like white guys.
This isn't youtube buddy.
BOOOM
Have you looked at a /r/politics comments section recently? Obama gets bashed anytime he does something remotely similar to Bush.
If you bought a computer and came home one day to find someone updated the hardware but installed a bunch of toolbars and popup ads that you can't remove, how would you feel?   Additionally, could the generation of gamers who think its totally cool to not have to earn a damn thing in game anymore because you can just pay your way through content please bludgeon themselves with sega saturn controllers to unconciousness? 
Leg presses are satisfying and it's relatively easy to lift heavy, but I think we can all agree that squats are indispensable.  Having said that, up 'till relatively recently I've never been good at (and never enjoyed) squats. What worked for me was to retrain myself by lifting much lighter and concentrating on technique, then building back up slowly, week by week.  I look forward to squats these days, but am lifting nowhere near the weights I was with my shitty old techniques.  
i've got a similar rig.  i went with a gigabyte mb though.  can't recommend it enough.  the psu calculators all said i should get a 600w unit and even then i wouldn't be able to upgrade too much...  i did the same when i got a ups...  all together the ups says I'm only pulling 200w with world community grid running.  i've yet to see this get over 300w.  just a heads up.  Obviously too much is better than not enough though.
Right now, there are tons of children and teens who are very into computers. And I'd be willing to bet that, if given the chance, they would love programming. I'll bet more of them want the legendary game-tester occupation, than game-programmer right now though.
don't just uninvite them. get the two you know together and have an open, frank conversation about why it won't work for their friends to stay and how you wish they would have asked you first because now it makes you look like the bad guy. let them know they're still welcome to stay but the friends will have to find other accommodations.  being honest and upfront is good, especially in situations like this. i bet your delicate hinting seemed to them like you were worried about what they might think of your tiny apartment, and they were trying to reassure you that they wouldn't mind. if you had flat out told them that you do mind, i doubt they would have invited the others.
Wouldn't Storm's powers be useless in space?
Do you have a cite for this? Or is this just a guess on your part?
Breastfeeding mothers require about 300-500 extra calories per day, really just eating slightly bigger portions for each meal and an extra snack or two a day should do it so it's probably not going at add too much to the grocery bill.  If the mother is working, there is the cost of a good pump, those run about $200. You can get cheaper manual pumps, but for many women they aren't as efficient at getting the milk out - really this will vary, some women are um, better milkers than others and it doesn't necessarily relate to how much she is producing. Babies are much better at getting the milk out than a pump. Plus, the cost of bottles and milk storage bags.  I am a strong advocate for breastfeeding but many babies do thrive on formula. 
Why does one have to believe anything. what matters belief? and what matters believers?
Who says our government doesn't protect us and serve our best interests?
Nor was theres, it was the winter...
aaand boom goes the dynomite.
Go for it. Has it been refrigerated at all? Just give it the old smell test.
Absolutely! These obviously terrible players just talk and talk and talk. I will casually mention to the Morde just destroying our lane that we should hang back and try to last hit a bit to keep the lane manageable since they have  a warwick....but no...he just keeps going, gets ganked by ww and then rages at me for not saving him. Some players just insist that they are good when doing slightly better than other shitty players against a terrible team. "OMG I WENT 11/11/3 IM CALLING YOU BAD"  Ranked games don't really suck for me. I like banning draft a lot and its fun to pretend I'm good. :)
I've enabled it a bunch of times. I don't think I've ever disabled it. It's weird. :)
What if there are, and they're just hiding...
Sorry, I got distracted by the "Inception: How it should have ended" video.
Nordic countries, for instance. There are quite a lot of Yield signs in use, and the larger road has a right of way automatically. (Also a metric asston of roundabouts.) The actual Stop sign is somewhat of a rare breed, of which you really take notice. It usually means that for some reason the intersection requires more attention, perhaps because of low visibility or something. You really need to come to a full stop in front of a stop sign before you proceed. It's a well-known point that often comes across during your practical driving test.  I must say, that the often maligned motoring culture here, while having it's downsides, pales in comparison with the picture of the US one I get from these comments. O_o Perhaps one thing making driving a bit less terrifying here is that one needs to be 18 years old to get a driving licence (except for mopeds and tractors and suchlike) and the driving test is fairly strict.   *Edit: Also, the rules about the right of way are quite explicit and involve a number of things in addition to the aforementioned Stop sign, so you will often need to stop in an intersection even without them. (I think that's what Sir_Knumskull was getting at.) Personally, I have no idea what one is obligated to do in the US when one encounters a stop sign. A friend I was riding with when I visited the US tended to treat them as Yield signs, but then again I probably shouldn't use a guy who had no problem driving underage when he lived here as a model for appropriate behaviour in traffic.
To be fair, they're not religious people. Their church is a total charade. It's a facade for their business as a law firm, where they sue anybody who assaults them. They bait people into attacking them, and then make money off of it.  I would not be one bit surprised if their entire family are atheists.
Not to mention the effect on teachers, who have to plan for more/longer periods each day and all of the work that comes with having more students. I think you would see the quality of education drop as teachers and students got burned out. I would be thrilled to see lengthened school years, but longer *days* probably isn't the most effective way to go, from both a student and teacher perspective.
Oh come on, it's *skiffy*!
Just like my woman.
Needs support for color profiles.
I just made this. It was a little wetter than I like my chili, so next time I make it I'll use less water. Otherwise, it was great.
i assumed you were a girl because i had a 1/1 chance. i failed most math classes because i'm lazy, but now i have thousands in disposable income from selling weed and i go to community college where I'm a member of the SGA and an A B student. i try... life is hard though...
If only it were Ice Road Fuckers, then I wouldn't complain
I definitely want to go budget for my first build. Thanks for the info.
I wonder the opposite. How can someone eat so many calories a day, day in and day out, to become over 300lbs? (Not implying the OP is 300lbs) Personally, when I am full, I'm full for hours and I can't each lots at a time, my stomach is only so big. 
That is some fucked up shit. "You are being tested"? What the hell is wrong with those people? Talk about a religion of fear.
GIAD - girl/guy I am dating (definitely not a girl/boy-friend)
Your coworker doesn't understand the meaning of god. http://www.thefreedictionary.com/_/dict.aspx?word=god God is a being that is worshiped; the universe is neither of those things. 
Yes! This is is *exactly* the comic I was looking for, good find! Now I must get back to running with praying mantis arms...
XD   Yeah...  I used to have a couple young iguanas when I was much younger. I had no idea CWDs looked the same.   Do you know how closely related they are? Is a CWD just an iguana that happened to live in a more wet climate and evolved to cope (or visa versa)?
proper wheel filters? what pore size are they and where do you get them? I was looking for the .2 or 2 nm or whatever those small ones are but couldn't find them anywhere.
Ahh.. But is it hot-swappable? 
i hope you're not ironic, so have an upboat and an orangered
Ah, the clown suit. I personally always look forward to it.  http://www.penny-arcade.com/comic/2008/1/2/
Actually, I remembered I lived within walking distance from a T-Mobile store (just moved to Chicago) so I just went a played with one. It really didn't blow me away and I love my trackball that lights up and it doesn't have that. I'm sticking with my N1.
and i can squirt
No, no you're not.
Was he trying to say astrology or astronomy? Either way, what a build up!
Ha! I've been thinking of making a thread about this subject.  Self Bias Resistor by Fear Factory  The entire a life less plagued album by Carry On All Me First and the Gimme Gimmes  Today's Empires Tomorrow's Ashes by Propaganhdi
http://www.last.fm/user/SlimSkull  It amuses me seeing "very high" under treeple's names!
I would love to read it too.  Post a google doc of a good draft?
It's a pic of an actual billboard that's been altered by the [Billboard Liberation Front](http://www.billboardliberation.com/),  not a photoshop.
I think in that case, you are just wasting your time and could possibly hurt you in the end. If there is something deep between you and you want a flirty pen pal then that's your decision. I just don't see the point.
I crafted my reclaimed metal with my Vintage FaN and it just made scrap metal.
I suffer with this problem all the time at my library. Part of me feels that kids should be able to read whatever they darn well please... but the 'patron' in me just cringed at giving a 13 year old a copy of Battle Royale to check out. It's a painful conundrum.  
One million dollars worth of needle punctures with no ink. Ask any junkie how much cash they've shoved through a needle.
Yes, just like OP is one with the stair
I challenge him to a duel 
It's only okay if you type with your cock. :P
Ignore if, it he talks to you about it, just say that you don't like to discuss religion at work.
I think bill gates is a cool guy he will be okay with it.
That makes my coffee look... so *bland*...
They said the items that give a bonus wont be buy-only. They also said that only cosmetic items are for sale. Hats = cosmetics. They are part of the set, but they by them self do nothing.
system? it was a mac
Your Ctrl+C / Ctrl+V skills are outstanding. I'll remember that trick next time I understand I'm too fucking stupid to partake in actual constructive discussion.
Probably depends on where you're posting and what. If you weren't getting views I'm guessing your posts were getting caught it spam filters.  If that's true then I wouldn't be surprised if it blocks accounts that post a number of links that get marked as spam. Try talking to the mods of where ever you've been posting. 
*Woosh*
&gt;Plus, when you see this design you'll realize there is nothing to protect, it's beyond terrible.  Ok, now you're just teasing us :D However, I have no doubt they probably got someone cheap / inexperienced to do it and they pulled a serious WTF. I actually make a decent bit of coin off fixing messes like that as well.
I want the OP of this pic to see this so he can EAT A DICK.
Believe it or not, there was once a time in Japan when you could buy magic mushrooms and other psychedelic delights at your neighborhood head shop--legally!
Dude = lying douche. Go with instincts. Next question! :)
Ooh finally something where those goody two-shoes humans do something nasty :). 
This is brilliant!
Americans are responsible for fucking up lots of stuff, we should just take the hit on this one sooner rather than later.  Metric &lt;3
that video was like the seven years of my life in a nutshell
Would you disagree that it is beneficial to them if a good item doesn't come along that often for free?  They may or may not do it, but you must admit they would be better off if they did.
The whole movie is "super cringe worthy". The rape scene was just icing on the cake at that point of the film. Great film...
Steal Jesus' sake?
I love it.
Main theme should be written in cut-time. This would make for a much easier read...  Edit: Still awesome though...long overdue.
Microsoft doesn't even have production browser that can display JPEG XR, so it's no surprise it hasn't taken off. Microsoft definitely hasn't beaten anyone to the punch, if they're not going to try any harder than that.
Yeah, I was thinking, but didn't say, that I wonder if the ratio would be consistent. I spent months on this, so I don't want to mess it up.  I was planning on using the spring water, but the boiling it too is a great suggestion. Thanks!
uhh...yes it is.
I haven't touched mine either, but that's because the disk stays in the console.  Although, I have a PS3 so I guess its a moot point.
According to my counselors, it was because I was raped. Hence, major security issues, self-esteem in the gutter, disbelief that anyone would ever want damaged goods. 
Wow, that guy can really dunk.  ...Oh, wait...
 For like the 30th time....
Because every other sport already tests physical ability.
Yeah, I saw that after I posted from my phone unfortunately (there's no way to edit on the RedditIsFun app).   But Pandorum does indeed feature monster turtle-looking creatures. Good luck.
[The Andrews Sisters - Bei Mir Bist Du Shein](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Xe2UXccid40)
Chocolate...resistance is futile for me. 
*No major university wants to publicly admit that one of their professors is an intellectual fraud*   A lot of places are like this. One employee a company I worked at was caught sending very very expensive ($1,000s) items to himself and selling them on eBay. Red handed. Charges were not filed, he was simply terminated. There are a lot of reasons why organizations take the quiet road. The company's reputation and (in this case, primarily) legal costs are the reasons why I think the thief in the company I worked for got away with only getting terminated. 
you'll never learn
If Pakistani troops are firing at American, or fighting side by side with the militants, the Americans have every right to defend themselves. The border is not a suicide pact.
You're right, but I think the OP's point is not that the lawyers are supporting the speech so much as that they are advising them to incite violence so they can sue for damages.  That does seem like something for which a lawyer should be disbarred.   I think it's likely that this is what they're up to, but proving it is another thing. For me to file a complaint on that basis seems to me to claim that I have knowledge of their actions that I do not have.
Don't expect your cars to last as long as the do in Aus. because all the crap they throw on the streets to melt the snow corrodes the crap out of it.  Mitigate by washing your car often in winter, or just drive a winter beater.
No two see the same Maru.
Auto-tuned dog.
(just watch him/her try to have it both ways)   /anticipating
What?  Like if he got really fat?
Conviction is comparable to Assassin's Creed, but linear and with guns. It's fast paced, with brutal hide-and-seek assassination gameplay- like a whole game of the Batman takedown areas. However, don't buy it on PC because the DRM is terrible.
You do lose the bucket as well though, but if you have loads of buckets/iron for more buckets, it's definitely a long lasting fuel source.
I don't know about terrible, they are merely average.  The xB is pretty decent inside, if really underpowered and horrible aerodynamics. The xA was hideous, but the tC doesn't make me want to stab anyone.
Confirmed. I laughed, thought about it, and then felt bad.
Coming from Iceland, this makes me very happy. I would love to see a [viking](http://i.imgur.com/MtJV8.jpg) in the UFC.
Have not been there for a while. This is new. I hope we see a trend.
Ow! So not only do I **not** own a '67 Fender Stratocaster, but I **have** *heard* about the bible. Mo-ther-fucker!
What kind of lock are you using? Would a padlock WITH A KEY work? (Combination padlocks are more easily broken into.)
John Mayer - Who Says
We talkin' laugh at or laugh with?
If your concerns are genuine and the allegations you complain about are true, then I don't think WBC has any legal recourse against Reddit or the private parties who are submitting bar complaints. 
the adults are talking
i'll be scroggling my heart out then.  adding you guys to friends in last.fm
Since the standalone FFH game fell through, I've been looking forward to that mod like nobody's business.  I think, for the last year or so before Civ 5 came out, I played maybe one or two normal Civ 4 games; the rest were FFH multiplayer.
what did you do to lose it?
I wouldn't suggest ironing your mic. I know that it usually fixes wrinkles in clothes, but I guarantee you from past experience that it doesn't fix cracky mic problems. You're just gonna have to trust me on this one.
nice post
Well, I use gamebooster and such to play on single player and it runs pretty good.  However, if I play online, oh god.  CHOP CHOP!
Water is a solvent, compounds can do things when they can move around in a solvent. Otherwise chemicals tend to just sit there.
There's a whole lot of non-issue issues that they get done.
Only if you put your pants back on.
haha i'm not even sure what this is supposed to mean, but if you really are the shiz, i'd love to smoke with you.  hell even if you're not, i'd be happily down. = )  i only indicated that i'm straight because i would assume if i were a guy, that's not the first thing that would cross my mind.
That... to use a vampire analogy, that shit's like garlic and holy water to me.
I got one of these saddles, threw it on the pig expecting some leisurely ride. The pig immediately jumped in the ocean and swam directly out to sea at warp speed (It was seriously like riding a pork flavored jet-ski). I was a good mile from where I clicked to ride the pig before I figured I should get off.
Awesome.  We're in NY so it is a bit different, we're thankfully not 3 hours away, but maybe I need to loosen up too :-p
Since you want one group to have more rights than the other, you are an advocate of oppression.
I have a feeling if you just got a piece of glow in the dark paper for $2 it would give you the same effect on your current mouse.
They're off to find the puppy of the day.   But what if they should find a mangy stray?   Still the puppy yearns, time so slowly turns, Someone there is yipping.   Keepers of the treats, oh how their heart beats,   When a puppy they are gripping. 
"This is a big fuckin' deal"
This is your girlfriend.  It could have been longer.
OMG. "Moon People" gets 4.5 stars?  Maybe they meant 4.5 teeth. That's how many teeth the fans of this book have.
For those that have lived in the Philippines this is pretty normal. Catholic Church is basically a political entity rather than a church. The church endorses candidates from the pulpit, Nuns actively critic policy decisions, etc... 
I agree.  That's def. a great start.  I'd make the eyes/mouth a bit larger.
Do U want 2 kiss me?
i'm just wondering... who are all the people downvoting this?? :(  i mean, why downvote a simple, honest request. i am dissapoint.
People have been using the item trading system heaps when I was online, yeah, sure, people wouldn't be in the fight for ~2mins, but really it made little to no difference in the game play. Plus I got rid of my spy hat for a scout hat, for free. No waiting, no paying. It is all good.
The difference is that NYC has a comprehensive public transportation network, if Seattle had the same we wouldn't be so concerned about parking prices. 
And when you die?
yes!!!
[ETN.fm](http://ETN.fm)
Sex and the City of God
Yes, they probably worked for you but everyone has a different learning skills.  The OP might learn best with an instructor-led class.
One last thing-- just to focus on what we have in common, rather than what we have apart.  As I said earlier, I think it's very rare for a team that "deserves to win" not to. I do think the Bears deserved to win that game. And I think a lot of people bitch and moan too much about one particular incident-- perhaps a bad call by the official, an interception at an inopportune moment, a player slipping-- and then say "we deserved to win, and didn't just because of that mistake." For example, when the Cubs lost in the playoffs because a fan knocked the ball out of a players hands, a lot of people blamed that person for the loss. But in reality, there were 7 games played, 9 innings each, and lots of things happened both ways that affected both teams. A lot of times, you could respond to "but if that didn't happen we would have won" with, "yeah, well, but if this didn't happen we would have won by even more."  This is the concept that I think you're fixated on. And I agree with it. And normally I would support you telling people "don't bitch about that one thing that went wrong and act like it was the only thing all game that mattered, when you didn't play well enough to covercome it for the rest of the game."  The problem is that you said "by definition." Had you not incorrectly used the phrase "by definition" (and then done it again later), we would be shaking hands and drinking internet beers. But my point is, while 99/100 times, no one bad bounce determines the outcome of a game, *sometimes enough bad bounces happen* such that a team cannot possibly overcome those random events and win. Even if it *never* happens in practice, I *still* disagree with you, because in theory it can happen, and therefore it is not excluded *by definition.*  I'm guessing we've both exhausted the will to argue. I'm going to leave you with this request: don't use the phrase "by definition" unless you're willing to provide a definition and allow others to see how the definition of something logically leads to your claim. If you have a request for me, I'll read it carefully and consider it.
Gob: Hey, guy. They tell me you're the actor who plays Marta's brother, Tio.  Spanish actor: Como?   Gob: Oh, you're gonna be in a coma, alright. 
So is today opposite day?
yes, physically separate clusters (airgapped) are the recommended deployment model.  likewise, one must also consider that the VMs will be sharing a vswitch and it's extremely difficult (currently) to do filtering of traffic between VMs, so host-based firewalling is a must.  this will be made easier in the near future as vepa becomes a standard and manufacturers begin implementing it, though.
And there are a few bands experimenting with Fusion/Hip-Hop sounds, and RH Factor is one of them.  This is an awesome track, Common's part is done in one take I believe.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u3a1DTFVKoQ
It doesn't need to be said, but that's why I'm saying it.  Jimi Hendrix's cover of All Along the Watchtower.
I'm pretty sure this is the birth of Jesus Christ.
&gt;  attacked the president over what police say was the cancellation of bonuses and promotions. Since when do police get bonuses and expect promotions? I, for one, would not bat an eye if the president decided to round up the rogue police using the military and throw them all in a deep dark hole.
Sure, they have a right to build a disorienting, acontextual, facade-based design with no sense of scale that does little to respond to the vibrancy of lower Manhattan pedestrian activity.  But is it right?
I think that hovering is implied? A full stand would be kinda silly. But like I said, this is a whole new world to me, too!
That's messed up...
You can't prove I didn't.
&gt;He can't fap like most guys do.  He wears them to fap  ಠ_ಠ 
I was in this situation a few years back, my grandpa had been suffering for a few years, the end was coming, I decided to skip a few days of school to go to Florida to see him. He died the day I got back. I sincerely hope you get there, I'm sorry to say I have no help to offer but an upvote and a little good luck. 
&gt;The "BLOC Québécois" party isn't very strong, and is mostly supported by older population.  I disagree.   Some months ago, 300 young souvereignists met at [that event](http://ruefrontenac.com/nouvelles-generales/politiqueprovinciale/26118-independance-quebec).
No, that would be silly.
I am an Odinist.
Also, T-Mobile stated that EZ-Texting went well beyond their agreement with T-Mobile in what they could provide.  The medical marijuana dispensery list was just one of many.  http://arstechnica.com/tech-policy/news/2010/09/t-mobile-we-dont-care-about-weed-but-txt-service-broke-agreement.ars
yay another facebook argument about politics...
Satan says the members of the American government sold their souls...i.e., fuck Andrew Zimmern.  How much do you get paid to fly around the world and eat amazing food?
True.  Succeed or fail, I get to learn something.  Thanks for that.
Absolutely!
Go forth to glory!
Lord of the Ringmasters of the Universe
Or we go Waco on their church. I like my idea better.
99.999% of the bases in one genome of one sperm cell contain the same data as other sperm cells.
Are you the owner of your own body?  If someone tries to rape you and you use violence to defend yourself are you violent?  How about if you're growing food for your family and you defend it to save yourself?  You're violent for doing this?  You're basically saying "people can't plan for the future by accumulating things like food or money" because you think you can just take whatever you want.  If someone disagrees with someone else's claim to property there will be arbitration organizations to resolve disputes like courts are supposed to do.
You call that a glitchy baseball game?  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7gjfZABX8Kw
I stumbled onto their music while looking through YouTube results for Simon &amp; Garfunkel's "Cecilia". I loved their cover of it and have been a fan ever since.  [Local Natives do "Cecilia"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XdnjfxXpr7g)  edit: spelling derp.
Pros: Very easy Cons: Very loose. Has fucked four of my teammates already Grade: 6/10
One of my favorites now.
When you post something, make sure it is also visible when you are logged out. If it is not, then contact the Mods of that subreddit, and get them to unspam the post, as it has been caught in the spamfilter.   Reddit probably thinks you quite the spammer since everything you've done so far has been flagged as spam. Verifying your email and getting mods to unspam post should help.
If she starts to sneeze, I'm running the other way!
Wow, missed opportunity right there :(
*Enhance!* 
Well, they swore up and down that getting rid of the bury button was to solve the problem of bury brigades like the "Digg Patriots."  Me, I think it was so they could pimp themselves out and we'd just have to take it. 
Yeah, I think it all depends on your schedule. Being able to continually pump out SOG is awesome, also some plants are not idiot proof. I've seen my old roommate grow some diesel plants with various sizes in a soil setup and get about as much out of his 1 gallon bucket as his 2 gallon bucket. His five gallon buckets didn't do as well because he didn't know how to control the canopy properly. I defintely suggest a SOG for the newbies until they truly understand the concepts of canopy penetration and utilization of the plants resources. 
As someone living in the Northeast that hates Northeast sports fans, that loss was worth putting up with them for three Super Bowl wins.
&gt;Although I can understand their need for safety.  Which is why a security detail and good planning in regard to the location of the seating is important.
Both equally awesome.
[Obligatory](http://pretprieel.nl/pictures/Randy_Marsh_covered_in_ectoplasm.jpg)
This problem was modified and published by a chessbase.com reader with two extra pieces, but was refuted soon.  Here is the source where I (not the author of this thread) found this position almost a year ago, they show more similar problems: http://www.chessbase.com/puzzle/christmas2009/chr09-02.htm
I share your sentiment, but if it's any consolation, NASA has a long history of developing technologies that have proven useful on a daily basis to the lay person and global community.  While not the best site (renders funny in my browser), I found a [short list](http://www.thespaceplace.com/nasa/spinoffs.html) of everyday technologies derived from NASA funding.  I'm sure a little google-fu will turn up many more examples.  The moral here is that we get a lot of bang for our buck by investing in NASA, as well as other high-level and basic science programs.
You went full retard, man. Never go full retard.
Thanks for following up with that. I had the same unbreakable peace treaty (with Ramses as well!). I'm going to load up my save game and lob a nuke his way!
It seems like you have a thing for flagellation... 
murtherfuckers. yeah Obama, real champ that guy is, a real fucking *leader*.
Reads like it.
Thanks. Actually, I remembered I lived within walking distance from a T-Mobile store (just moved to Chicago) so I just went a played with one. It really didn't blow me away and I love my trackball that lights up and it doesn't have that. I'm sticking with my N1. The feel of the flip-out keyboard was cool, though.
&gt; I'd bet it never feels good to kill men  Speak for yourself philistine...
This reminds me of what they found in North Carolina.  [WARNING..DON'T CLICK IF YOU ARE EATING!..or grossed out easily. Click for vid.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TcKpx2DxGwY)
They don't actually use plastic.
Like an [elephant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TifeJZj7umA), or like the ant?
Watch the Obama Deception..  Impeach the bosses of Obama..
You realize that an entire Province is benefiting from this?  Wishing for the collapse of the oil sands industry will hurt all of us Canadians, very, very hard.
In America? That's a big overlap.
I'm not even sure why I came into the comments to see if someone had posted this. Maybe it's because I'm 10+ hours late. Derp.
Why do big girls give better head? They're hungrier. Terrible joke my boss told me years ago. 
No, everyone knows they both appeared simultaneously as a chicken omelet.
Not sure if it was intentional or if my computer has the best timing ever, but that's precisely where the video stopped loading for me. It was magical.
No, you're just heterosexual. 
What season/episode? I'd like to watch.
Well, I'm a lady, but I get the gist.
Okay, serious question: Why do respond to this about the existence of God? Sure, you may not believe in him now, but that doesn't make it a lie. A lie is, by definition, giving false information intentionally. We don't know whether there is or isn't some sort of deity, so saying "God is real" isn't a lie, it's just an uneducated guess. 
I thought he said,"If you don't fall asleep, you never wake up."
Hey Ents, came across this today and although its not really my cup of tea, its still a pretty cool stash box...and its cheap!
Your hair is beautiful! It looks so shiny and so healthy. You lucky punk!
WHERE IS THE FUCKING PICTURE?
Sounds like an inside job.
"Every day i'm huslin" 
Thats fuckin awesome!! I now know what I will do to my hubby if he cheats on me!!
Had the same problem.  Either a bladder infection or the cat decided they don't like the litter.  For our cat it was the litter.  Changed from the cedar pellet stuff to bulk throw on your driveway stuff.  Problem solved.
    We must move quietly; the subreddits are full of her spies, even some of the /r/trees are on her side.
http://www.reddit.com/r/lookatmygirlfriend
Okay, makes sense. I've been trying this. Holding onto something has been helpful, but my god do my knees hurt. 
thats not shitty advice GTFO
Thanks, I'll let him know when I see him next!
Just saw Jaws again last night for the first time in like eight years on a big screen at my buddy's apartment/movie theater/music venue.  Mesmerized, was I, at how the quality of that movie still stands up to some of the pathetic celluloid drivel peddled today.  The lighting was fantastic, the story was perfectly suspenseful with enough tasteful gore to provide schlocky scares without ruining the viability of the minor suspensions of disbelief requested of us as the viewers. I give it two upboats up.
Sex and the City of God.
I support this movement. BDO Auckland 2011, Tool and Rammstein FTW YUSS
what's so hard to understand about 'no'?
Yes.
Attn Microsoft:  This is how you do that.
Better for Google, sure.  Better for the user is a different question.
Soldier's Stash has been traded away for the Engineer's Cap, Sorry folks, Now willing to trade either the Stainless Steel pot or Hustler's Hallmark For Jayne's Hat. (tough guy's toque)
I prefer to use Occam's Razor. The thing is designed to do something nasty to a factory. In Iran. There's not really a whole lot of countries that want to directly intervene with Iran's rightful ambition to nuclear power.  A third country would have put together a crack team of developers to make the most intricate cyber attack in history so far. Something nobody has seen before, and then *teeheehee* point to Israel in a very obscure way to put the blame on them.  I'm not buying that.
Super, homie!
I have a chinese water dragon too, mines named [Bosco](http://imgur.com/GvjLN.jpg). probably the coolest pet i've owned
$500 worth of Reddit buttons ought to do...
I think 99.9% is too high, but you're correct, most people in the rest of Canada don't understand and don't care.  I spent a year living in a town on the Sask/Alberta border (you know where).  I gotta admit, I've met a lot more jerks from Alberta than I ever did from Quebec.  I mean really dumb, ignorant, get drunk and look for people to beat up assholes.  Regardless of the particulars of the law, I'll take Quebec over Alberta any day.  Just cuz you're sitting on top of oil doesn't make ya better than the rest of Canada.
The Original Leeroy Jenkins video cracks me up every time http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LkCNJRfSZBU
I want to reply to everyones comments with this- FUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUuuuu!
If you want to move to Europe and have half your damned paycheck taken away so you can get all of your state-hand outs than stop bitching about it and fucking move to Europe.  Or you could stay in America and have over a third taken with none of the benefits European citizens get. 
Upboated for lens flare
picture 4/6.  hes doing it right
WTF!!!!!!!!!!!!! How do you get maggots in your nose?!!?? 
Which chat room did you meet in? Or, if that is too much information you're willing to give, give us a hint about the type of chat room (general interest chats, looking for a relationship, etc)
Seattle Sounders FC
First heard of him about a year ago when I got my iPhone and Slacker Radio. Really stood out amongst the comics. I actually got is album "Good Day to CRoss a River..." Genius stuff. Everyone talks about his roasts, but I never saw them, his stand-up was amazing, though. RIP GG, you hilarious bastard.
Why do old people make Crayons?
I totally am.
Ever consider a hempy bucket?
You use unguarded include files. You just #define all the changable parts (key type, value type, function prefix, comparison) before you #include the implementation.   Eg   #define KEYTYPE int  #define VALUETYPE int  #define PREFIX int2int  #define LESSTHAN(a,b) (a&lt;b)  #include "tree-map-definition.h"  inside tree-map-definition.h you have  ...  VALUETYPE PREFIX##find(KEYTYPE key, PREFIX##node *tree) {   if (!tree) return NULL;   if (LESSTHAN(key,tree-&gt;key)     return PREFIX##find(key, tree-&gt;left);   if (LESSTHAN(tree-&gt;key,key)     return PREFIX##find(key, tree-&gt;right);   return tree-&gt;value;  }  ... other map function definitions  
I see.  Good to know that it's there, though.
I feel the same way about my entire (very small) family. I have some very close friends that I care about a ton, much more so than any family. I've always considered myself abnormal given what I see among the families of my friends. At least I know I'm not the only person who feels this way.
You wanted criticism... this is just a technical one.  Lowest model settings (graphix settings) is probably a bad idea while you're casting.  Thanks for doing this though!
Any hints on ID'ing fake profiles? I think I'm getting the hang of it, but wouldn't mind extra advice.
Thats what I use also!   Well I don't think I'll be able to bring my laptop seeing as I dont have a place to stay, but I could just bring a usb stick with my mix on it and use your laptop if you arent opposed.. Obviously this is if its even possible! But lets talk more with the host, whomever that is..
not down boating is one thing but up boating everything is something else unless they're really worthy. But I'll up boat you because I think you're cute. Also,  &gt; Smoke weed errday  *I know your secret*
Yeah, I sent a message to a mod and the sent me to an admin but never heard back.   Its just strange because I only posted about five links over the month, and two of them got at least 200 upvotes. 
Star Trek replicators. Or free energy.
&gt;**Dale Doback:** Why do you have Randy Jackson's autograph on a samurai sword?  &gt;**Brennan Huff:** Cause I bumped into him and all I had on me was this samurai sword... And you're not gonna not get Randy Jackson's autograph, Right?  &gt;**Dale Doback:** I would've done the exact same thing. 
Perhaps a little cumbersome as well? 
Get out of my head! I pushed the coffee table to the other side of the room so I could dance to this when I was a kid. 
More likely Pathmark or Waldbaums would probably be cheaper than the ghetto stores(ctown, keyfood, W. beef, associated, met) too  Edit: I would also try Target or Bj's
just delete it...isn't that what you do with all other pointless chain emails/letters/etc?
Seems like you still don't get it, since you're going off talking about handicapped folks. I thought I covered that in the "welfare **etc.,**" part there, but okay.   These people are there on their own free will...I didn't see anyone overtly suffering. Sure the work may be boring as all sin, but it pays.  Once more now: They are working. Willingly. For pay. Money. Which is spent on living. Food, shelter, water.
Buy Blockbuster stock.
i would not fuck her with a stick  i would not put in her my dick  for my life i would run away  hide underneath my bed i pray
Do you have to use the whole gift card in one sitting? It just prints the code on paper. Do I exchange this for an actual plastic card at the restaurant?  Also fatwallet.com has a cash back program with restaurant.com, so going through them makes it even more ridiculously cheap.
And all of Canada will be aching as a result.  Pragmatically, I do not desire the Albertan economy to be crushed.
I just don't understand. Is this a joke attempting to say that the Christians in Dallas are not really Christians? Or is it mocking missionaries that go to 3rd world countries, implying that Dallas is a 3rd world country. Or, is OP literally going on a mission trip to Dallas? 
If you're afraid of asking about your relationship status at this point, there are probably much better potential relationships to be in. 
If you are going to claim sub 1% market share browsers are competition, you are nuts.  There was no real competition before that.  Unless you want to count whatever bullshit aol was doing.  But at the time they either were using a rebranded netscape or a rebranded ie window.  I think it switched somewhere in the middle of the internet boom.
Troll?  I'm not the one blatantly bullshitting on reddit. &gt;I shoot at 1/8000 all the time with flash. Why do you fantasise about doing something so pointless? &gt;I shoot all the time with pocket wizards and 580exiis sync to my 5Dm2. Yeah, okay....
sorry, bad grammars, at work typing fast between customers.  We wanna do the Ratatat/Daft punk thing. Ill be doing turntablism/scratching/beat juggling/controllerism and he will be playing guitar through a Kaoss pad and or using ableton to make beautiful sounds.
I think the purpose of this is to *legally* take down WBC. To DDoS them with malicious intent is not legal.
&gt;He teaches science and astrology?  No, he "works at the local High school as a science teacher and astrology".  The man is paid to *be* astrology.  That's a heavy gig.
fucking douche bag first year law students...  and I can say that, because i used to be one.
Amen. 
That was one of the best glitches I've seen in any game
Don't confuse "Western Media" with "everybody in the world"   Lots of people who analyzed the elections, including guys like Nate Silver agreed that there is no concrete evidence of fraud.  I'm a young Iranian who doesn't like Ahmadinejad, but I still understand that Northern Tehran does not represent the population of the country as a whole.  Outside of the cities Ahmadinejad is overwhelmingly popular.   I wish he weren't President, but more because I think he's bad for Iran's image than because I think he's mismanaged the economy.
My roommate makes my bed every day (gee that sounds awfully weird) but I always tell her it makes no difference to anything. If anybody is seriously impressed by a made bed or unimpressed by an unmade bed I'd say you should probably re-evaluate your priorities in life.
Is that stuff any good? I might just want to cop a bottle of that this weekend.
Marinara and various other italian tomato sauces do not taste anything like tomatoes. i'm also not a tomato enthusiast, although i do love them on sandwiches because of that cool, crisp juiciness they add.
I think Soldier field is one of the finest stadiums in the league, it isn't Lambeau but it's the next best thing in my eyes. They should have a Superbowl there, no shortage of hotel rooms and it's as accessible as they get. Why don't they have an NFL team in Chicago btw? I could never figure that out..... :) don't even bring up MNF!
What is that word(s) that keeps getting cut off? is it Show ? .. It's becoming MadLibs with this. =P
I did verify the email address about two weeks ago
Upvote, save, comment.  Fuck yeah!!!! I'm so jealous you have so many. I had the snake and the small bat and maybe a third one. I also had a similar TMNT toy.
The chances were high.
This really can't be overstated. The fewer people we have voting down the crap, and more crap we get. Since our user-base is always growing, the makeup of the community is changing all of the time, generally based on the content that's currently popular. If the front page is all "Does anyone else like boobies?" then the only new users coming in will be the ones looking to talk about how much they like boobies. Eventually the content you like will dry up because the people that didn't come for boobies and "does anyone else" will leave.  You're actually making reddit better by downvoting the crap you don't like.
That's OK. IE9 doesn't do it either. ;-)
Either Tiffany or Susan. Maybe Vimes...
What do i win?
I really don't know what to say right now, I'm just angry. 
I had a full time job I did at home, then got laid off a year ago. Now, I run after the 2 year old all day. Just waiting for him to go to preschool so I can get a part time job (given my profession and where I live, it makes no sense to pay for childcare, I'd simply be handing them back my entire salary). But, we do a lot of activities, go to the park, have playdates, and I do all the housework as hubbs is gone about 10 hours a day.
"an ad for one"  Sorry, your original was almost unreadable due to 3 errors in 5 words.
Emulation is the best route, ePSXe can do quite a bit to make the game not look so bad.
Go on...
you have a permit for that right?
Sex toys. Dildos really should be nothing but medical grade silicone. 
"This isn't where I parked my car!"
Oil
I was impressed. I however am not ready to "start the work".
And fucking Okinawans. 
Thank you :]
&gt; I wanna save money but also bring back girls to my place.   Well, you can't have everything. There is nothing you can name as expensive as a woman. If you ask how much a car costs, you will get a definite answer. Same for a plane or a boat. But when you ask this about a woman, the answer is, "You don't have enough."  And it doesn't matter how much you have -- by definition it's not enough. As soon as the woman discovers how much money you have, two things happen:  1. It becomes hers.  2. It's not nearly enough to make her happy.  What do you think Bill and Melinda Gates argue about? Yes, that's right -- money. It seems Bill doesn't have enough.
That seemed more forced.
Political analyzer:  http://apps.facebook.com/politics_fb/
I hate really hate my hometown of Menifee sometimes.  A few years back, the FBI arrested a bunch of neo-nazi punks, including a bunch of people I went to school with and an assistant coach at the high school.
No silly, that's just magic
Just put a few artist and story writer brains in and use the "short film" setting on your blender.
I'm also looking forward to Steps in Scala: http://www.amazon.ca/Steps-Scala-Introduction-Object-Functional-Programming/dp/0521747589/
Tell your brother to go get a REAL JOB and stop living off our tax dollars.  Fucking socialist...
I WILL LOOK INTO THIS!
Thank the lord it is Free for PC. Oh wait this is Valve. What am I thinking? DUH!
damn you.
I love the snowflake method, but I learned it [here](http://www.advancedfictionwriting.com/art/snowflake.php).  Would love to hear from anyone who's used this method and what they've learned from using it.
&gt;  AgwaOoooooootrrwvammmmcdaawyuabwàrwzmiooOookp  I tend to agree.
im never getting a boat.
I've been trying to score some Levis 511 jeans in Canada, the best skinny-but-not-too-skinny jeans for my frame. Levis.com and Amazon sell them for $45, but won't ship to Canada. The only place I can find them in stores in Canada is Urban Outfitters, and they sell them for $90!
I've only played TF2 a couple of times. What do hats do, other than look funny?
&lt;Insert everything Carl Sagan ever said here.&gt;  edit: I mean, I dunno. I guess there's plenty of inspiration to be found in the inner workings of a cat if you look for it.
And time and gravity. 
linking to your inbox doesn't work too good
I thought you couldn't build muscle while you are running a caloric deficit.
Thank you, I can't believe I still mix those up.
Then your whole army is stuck on the high ground. They can counter attack your base and you have nothing to stop it.
I put that I've had unprotected sex with THOUSANDS and never get tested, but I have really amazing super blood that will give the recipient latent telekinetic powers.  No callbacks yet.
I think there is some sort of misunderstanding going on here.  So I'll sort of start over and see if this clears it up.  &gt;I'm not a capitalist, and the last thing I want to see is armies of poor women being forced to bear children for the rest of the world (which is what would happen if childbearing was monetised)  Okay so we both then agree that women should not be paid or given an incentive to have children especially during these times when overpopulation is an issue.  &gt;but if you ARE a capitalist, how do you go about deciding what is paid work and what should be unpaid work?  I wouldn't call myself a capitalist, but for the sake of the argument I'll assume I am.  Paid work is what people won't do for free.  If People won't clean toilets for free, it becomes a paying job.  &gt;Don't you think it is unfair that it is almost always "women's work" which is unpaid?  I don't agree with this premise at all.  I assume you mean 'women's work' by the stereotype, cooking, cleaning child rearing.  She does this by choice.  She could work and hire a babysitter, or she could not if she decides not to.  This is usually decided by the couple when they decide to have children.  Nobody is forced into anything.  If I choose to stay at home and do housework instead of working, I choose to work for free in exchange for not having to have a paying job.  &gt;And don't you think, considering childbearing and childrearing is so essential to society, that people doing that work deserve the same kind of pay and benefits as say cops and soldiers (the closest I can think of to a biological role for men)?  As stated above, and especially considering in this argument I'm a capitalist: No.  People have children for FREE, thus there is no reason to monetize it at all.  And given the economic times, we want less children, so really tax people who have children (or at very least remove all tax subsidies).  Having children is not an essential service.  The human race will not die out as we are not in any situation where people will just simply opt to have no children as a society.  I would ask why you'd bring up such an argument though unless you think the free market should somehow pay women to have children?  And if you do, this is why I'd consider that opinion insane.  It makes no sense from really any standpoint except that of greed.
The difference is that the smart people class used to be actually in charge instead of mocked and marginalized. 
Ah okay. Then i understand. I usually flash my lights if I want them to go, and I only do it when its fairly empty on the roads. I observe the right of ways rules if theres traffic though. 
Only when it is announced to and permitted by the city hall.
moc
oh yeah.
I wish you did this for Canadian cities.  I would jump all over this.
the second my contract is up with rogers i'm out and will never sign a contract with them again...three years @ $100/month and you still insist on charging a $8 system access fee and a 'government regulation recovery fee'?  that's criminal...
Most people are horrible, so most people marry someone horrible, so most marriages are horrible. QED.
How do you grow edibles?  Bury those mini chips ahoy cookies in soil?
Yep. And it just reverted itself. What I ended up doing was removing the requirement to login to my server to see my files. Slightly dangerous, but it's the only thing that fixed it.
If you're afraid that simply asking him for a status report is going to pitch him into an emotional death spiral, then neither one of you is currently in shape for a relationship.  His expectations are __his__ problem. If he puts all kinds of crazy requirements upon himself that no human could ever fulfill and then falls apart at the drop of a hat, then he needs to get some help.   I suggest that you be his good friend if you can handle that, and look to healthier men for romance.
I don't think hunting makes someone a bad person.  I was just saying that those who do hunt should be honest about it is.  And yes, I've had all kinds of hunted food before as almost every man in my family is an avid hunter.  If there was no thrill to the hunt, there would be no hunting.  No one would go through all of that trouble just to get slightly better tasting meat that you could actually just buy anyway.  I really have nothing against hunting, only hunters who refuse to accept the reality of the practice.
I used to have a facebook account.  I quit when I learned:  1. Just how unsafe they were for my online security. 2. When they started censoring breast feeding photos 3. When they took away a guys account, 'cause his last name matched a company that wanted to have a facebook page of their own. 4. When I started getting friend requests from people I knew in High School, and Grade School that were never my friend, but asked me why we never hung outback in the day.  "Maybe because you acted like an asshole to me, you fuckwad?"
great show!
I cant find where this box actually comes up on the webpage...
I'm all for team pie. Wish they'd serve it where I work.
Easy. Turn partial matches off in the uniform screen. Then use "e" to see what they actually have equipped. You can also use the stocks screen to see what weaponry and armor you need more of.
Repo Man is actually a good movie, stoned or straight.
 &gt; reddit, please, spread this! Police brutality in Stuttgart, Germany. (  The title says enough, what the fuck do you think 'Police Brutality' means? 
Since when is Andy Dick a hipster? 
Cool. I love ass to mouth.
The monkeybowl as evolved into the monkeysphere.
i agree with you, and i don't think that songs that focus on distorted guitar leads are exactly fusion. take a listen to some of the stuff i posted. i recommend the album Ear Food for a start
[Kanamara Matsuri](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kanamara_Matsuri)
exactly!
If you dig deep you will find lava. Problem with lava is that the bucket you've got to use to collect the lava currently gets used up as well when you use lava for a furnace. It takes 3 iron bars to make a bucket. So its really not worth it. Wood is almost infinite, build a tree farm by planting the small trees that fall off the larger trees.
Cotton is overrated.  Your tits, on the other hand, are fantabulous.
Watching it and reading it are two different things.   Mainly because there are words/symbols/themes that a lot of people would miss otherwise.
tl;dr **rap sucks**
Is he in Iraq or something?
I'm almost embarrassed to know this much about the film, but I think Kershner is demonstrating how Hamill should tell R2 to "slow down" in the shot right before Boba Fett fires from the hallway. Hamill puts his hand on R2 in almost the same way.
Install a custom hud. No more bs clogging up the main menu. m0re's hud still works nicely
Lima beans.  KILL IT WITH FIRE!
iPod touch. 
I'm from LA, went to school and worked in SF and traveled for business atleast once a week between the two locations. My driving style changes in each city and you are absolutely correct. In the bay area, i use the blinker as a polite request "can i come in?" in LA i use the blinker once one of my tires has crossed the lane lines already to say "hey i'm coming in". But one thing remains constant, i get road rage everywhere
I have Facebook and hate when websites do that.  Sadly enough this whole social media is starting to be used against us.  Think of employers who "Google" your name and find your Facebook page splashed up on their screen.  Obviously Facebook isn't forthcoming on how to secure your profile from unknown people (yes I know how to secure my profile).
Been dead to me for years.
Yup, that was it.  Thanks for the link.
I don't know of any good replacements. I fucking love cheese, and not a day goes by that I don't think of cheese, i miss pizza
interesting! i googled your symptoms and stumbled upon the following site. please alert the nearest adult of your condition and show them this url.  http://learningdisabilities.about.com/od/learningdisabilitybasics/p/rdgcomprhnsn.htm
I already know about this and r/weedporn... but they only have about 800 readers combined, pretty fucking sad. Trees has about 25x that, I want the most viewers/contributors possible.. lets see some pics here people!
yea.....if they were good enough for the Father of our country...oh, wait.  Those were cherries.  Carry on.
Here fucking here.
I think that's a given.  The Old Ones live....
I never even realized that he was released! Rex Ryan, you magnificent, devious bastard.
Why?  Very simple.  At least half of those families (and honestly, probably more) would simply piss the money away.  Either get them out of irresponsible debt or buy unnecessary shit.  No thanks!  The education deal we're setting up is two fold.  First to provide some funds for needed capital improvements of the local district.  But the bulk will go to fund higher ed for the students.  Still working the details out, but basically the deal is if you get a HS GPA of X and go to a 2 or 4 year college and maintain a GPA of Y we will provide a $Z scholarship each year.  One thing we're struggling with now is how to acknowledge those students who do well in HS but choose to pursue the military or something other than higher ed.
Absolutely!  Whenever I write code that is supposed to be 100% comparable with some legacy code in an obsolete language, I set up a unit test that hammers on the code by giving the same random inputs (valid and invalid) to both routines and comparing the outputs.  It's amazing what you find when the random number generator tries cases that neither you or the original developer ever thought of trying.
Raising a glass to you and your friend, friend.  Cheers.
Hope I can help -- I was a pre-med biology major and didn't know if was for me.  My parents got me scuba certified freshman summer.  After scuba diving in the open ocean, **I LOVED IT** and knew I had to change majors to marine biology.  It happened by chance, but once I found something I liked school was 100x better.  Find something that interests you and you'll start to enjoy what you are learning!  **Proud to be a Marine Biologist. Stronger, smarter, and better than any Army Biologist** 
"its dead Jim"
The extra +light is nice, but EMP is actually most useless against those two units because they're both 2/3rds HP 1/3rd Shields for their health pools. So really, mass marine and some stim and kite, esp because ghosts are good lift targets and marines less so.
No, *I* read this and then wished reddit offered an unread feature.
Well, thats not good... I love that card.
Taking the fun out of fundamentalism for almost two thousand years.
That's really cool.  I've been experimenting with stuff like this recently myself.  Had an idea to use my old lava lamp but alas I've no idea where it is.
if you are anywhere other than San Diego i agree, leave. lol.  come up, we can make some beats throw a rave. We got decent venues that go unused.
Oh, I'll let you go first ;)
Oakville, ON
Primary - Guitar, Vocals if that counts  Secondary - Drums/misc percussion, Ukulele, Mandolin, Bass  Noodle - Piano, Tin Whistle, Harmonica, Jaw Harp, Flesh Ocarina   I used to have a decent ocarina but some asshole stepped on it :c
The whole menu at McDonald's, minus the salads.
I've been wanting a way to control volumes per tab in Chrome for awhile now.
Interesting... hiding where exactly?  This is an interesting theory, but I find it unlikely.  Either way, I suppose anything's possible. 
I think the best relationship advice on here ends with "let him know," and I needed to hear that.  Thanks!
King of the Impossible!
Would it not allow me to post a link in over a week?  I have posted six submissions, two of which got over 200 upvotes.
&gt;I also bet there is someone in a government intelligence office somewhere that could answer the OP's question with 100% certainty.  Yep, I'm sure the NSA will own right up to trying mass hypnosis over the internet.
OP here...  fair enough
Because IRL people find your account and all of it's compromising content?
my name... is scruffle muffins...
lol
Or, why not just increase the address length, use a network mask, and be done with it? I understand a redesign might be more elegant, but an extension could be cheap and easy. Admittedly, all I know about networking I read in a TCP/IP book my dad gave me back in the mid 90s. But IPv6 would essentially work exactly like IPv4, but treat the entire IPv4 network as a subnet.  * 255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.255.0.0.0.0 -&gt; IPv4 subnet * Anything less masking -&gt; IPv6 network
Proof? How about the fact that millions of people who eat that stuff aren't keeling over in droves? That should be proof enough. I'm NOT saying it's good for you, and I AM saying you should eat it in moderation. Shit isn't going to kill you if you take a bite, and that article was nothing but fear-mongering. Also, if they did a study, I want to see ALL the results, not just the ones that -support their message-
&gt;In a way, I almost feel sorry for most of the people who are in the WBC. Don't get me wrong, I don't condone what they do at all, but these people will never experience life the way we get to experience it.  They're all dirty lawyers who are in it for the money, not the religion. Every member of that church is a lawyer, or works for their law firm in some fashion.
Thank you! :D &lt;3
cock suckin'?
They can't roll back to v3 as the DB back-end changed from MySQL to Cassandra. Rolling back would be a giant sum of work.
I dunno about attorney disciplinary proceedings in particular, but in court proceedings, it isn't unusual for courts to impose sanctions on the plaintiff for filing a frivolous complaint.  I could see the bar trying to find out who JustRice is to impose such sanctions.  I think they have powers of subpoena and in some states there is an independent disciplinary judge with 3rd party subpoena power. But IANAL... still waiting on bar results.  But I have litigated a few times through lawyers and as a pro se and know that judges can get really pissy even if you are on solid ground.
my first thought when I saw this:  [my horn can pierce the sky!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ft457I--lMs)
I've always gotten Ativan (lorazepam) in detox.   All benzos function in the same way and you can get high from them. It's a matter of dosage. 
&gt; Amazing how compliant people can be when approached by an angry looking bearded guy wearing full gear who has just spent the last five minutes pacing around talking to himself. I would've hauled ass to a state over.
In regards to people watching the livestream, last weeks KotH, a caster mentioned that he would like to see more creep spread, and 15 seconds later, both players start to spread creep after not doing so for a good 10-15 minutes.  Point is: people will listen in on the livestream, it's just how it's going to be, I really wouldn't trust the honor system. If there's a way to delay the stream by around 5 minutes, it would be much better. It's only like 15-20s I think right now.   Then again, it is just some small tourney so w/e. 
http://sportsmedicine.about.com/od/flexibilityandstretching/ss/FoamRoller.htm  I have a set of these in different diameters and hardness.  It works great for back, legs, and shoulders.... arms = not so great.  
It would certainly scare the shit out of me.
The ex.
You know what, that could be any of a number of places near Salem, Oregon as well. Very similar vegetation and landscape. Thanks for the pic!
Yes, it is cool to have her idea adopted.  But the article makes it seem like she did a lot more.  Sorry if this butthurts you.  But bitching won't change the article.  So stop.
Reply with goatse.
No, it's  not. I watched the first season (twice) But the longer I sat there and the further along the story line progressed the more I felt cheated.  Basically there's a very strong feminist vein with the show entirely "gurl pwr" and is targeted at the female sci fi  buffs That's fine...  but I found it very degrading as a male.  All the leads are female, every male is either corrupted, criminal,  broken or plays second fiddle to a female character.  This is a female character driven show. They're the inside players, the movers and shakers that drive the story along.  Not to mention the writing in of religion into the story line. BSG had more than enough due it's referencing mormon myths and sourcing from the 1970's show.  But Caprica goes too far ... to include it into their cannon myth vs downplaying  it (it's science fiction not theology fiction) .  I would be able to deal with it if it wasn't for the lacking story line and shallow characters pushing "the one unified god" all the time as a group of rebels fighting all the other false religions out there theme.   Whatever... I'm not buying it.  Basically, This show sucks all the way around.
Why do you go to work?
when a *required* book is supplied by one author, through one publisher, i think that be called a monopoly?
You look so delicious with that tan and those cute aquamarine boy-shorts. And those breasts! And that nice round ass...*wow!*
They make him look like a lizard.
Some of us do this every day at traffic lights. The "pressure on those huge thigh muscles is" in fact, not very "tremendous."  *edit:*  To explain, the effort required of your legs in during a stable track stand is about equal that required of, you guessed it, standing. The deceleration can be a little bit tasking, as it requires that they actually counter the inertia of the bike with their legs to slow the rear wheel (notice the absence of brakes), but once you're stationary, it is more of a balancing act. The only wheel that can really be described as "locked" is actually the front. Notice how they prefer to keep it pointed to the right, up the slope of the embankment? Note also that their leading foot will also be the right one.  **You're halfway to track standing, folks.** Wheel cocked right, right foot forward.  The whole thing is rather more intuitive than it looks. While standing, one's reflex if they were falling to the right would be to put more weight on their right foot. The same applies here. The rider stands slightly more on his right pedal, countering his own tipping, but also pedalling the bike slightly forward, but more importantly - because his front wheel is turned right - back under his shifted body mass. Likewise, if he is falling left, his response will be to stand slightly more on his left foot, countering his own fall but also - because of the same turn of the wheel - swinging the bike back and to the left under his shifted centre of gravity.   Or, you'll see them throw the wheel over, putting its support on the side of the bike that needs it. But it's not preferred for sustained balance, and they'll use it more as a recovery tool, then return to locking it and using their feet to do the balancing.  Tight jeans, dated Ray-Bans, and unseasonably warm scarves are also great aids. Why these two aren't dressed appropriately is beyond me.
I see what you did there.
Awesome!
Thanks!
Yes. I used it earlier this week to thicken a sauce. Worked wonderfully.
http://www.knottyboys.com/ http://www.twistedmonk.com/  Both have really great free instructional bondage videos. I would probably start with Twisted Monk, just because it's down &amp; dirty and will get you started quickly. Two Knotty Boys has a bunch of really cool decorative knots and fun little tips and tricks and toys though once you start feeling creative.
So...much...win
&gt;There were no jolly little signs saying: You Don’t Have To Be Pitilessly Sadistic To Work Here But It Helps!!  &gt;But there were things to suggest to a thinking man that the Creator of mankind had a very oblique sense of fun indeed, and to breed in his heart a rage to storm the gates of heaven.  &gt;The mugs, for example. The inquisitors stopped work twice a day for coffee. Their mugs, which each man had brought from home, were grouped around the kettle on the hearth of the central furnace which incidentally heated the irons and knives.  &gt;They had legends on them like A Present From the Holy Grotto of Ossory, or To The World’s Greatest Daddy. Most of them were chipped, and no two of them were the same.  &gt;And there were the postcards on the wall. It was traditional that, when an inquisitor went on holiday, he’d send back a crudely colored woodcut of the local view with some suitably jolly and risqué message on the back. And there was the pinned-up tearful letter from Inquisitor First Class Ishmale “Pop” Quoom, thanking all the lads for collecting no fewer than seventy-eight obols for his retirement pension and the lovely bunch of flowers for Mrs. Quoom, indicating that he’d always remember his days in No. 3 pit, and was looking forward to coming in and helping out any time they were short-handed.  &gt;And it all meant this: that there are hardly any excesses of the most crazed psychopath that cannot easily be duplicated by a normal, kindly family man who just comes in to work every day and has a job to do.  &gt;Vorbis loved knowing that. A man who knew that, knew everything he needed to know about people.  -Terry Pratchett, *Small Gods*
that was a lot of fun to scroll through really fast. leafleafleafleafleaflealeafleafleafleafleaf SMOKE WEED
Dude, with a username like that, you've gotta have a story for this thread.
You ruined my...wait, my money machine has finished counting my 1.5 mil, ok right where was I? Oh right...life!
[From the British Transport Police 'Rogues Gallery'.](http://www.btp.police.uk/about_us/history/crime_history/rogues_gallery.aspx)
sorry ... they're still more obtrusive than the spammers.   if the admins were so worried about spam, it would get no further than /r/all/new/
God = 
The shit that really got to me was I found some article about a facebook app the Army made. That shit pulled all of my data and made like some sort of movie showing my name on the badge of a soldier, had all my friends names pop up, and pictures. My heart dropped and I went to my account to see if I was registered for anything turns out I was and it took me a while to get it off.  Scary fucking shit.  edit: oh turn on adblock and put the facebook code in (google it)
THAT TOOK FOREVER!!
So, did you send it to 10 people, or does posting it on r/atheism count?
Tenzin Gyatso's clan aint nutin to fuck wit.
I only wanted one part of the sleeve, my upper arm actually, and from there I let the artist do what he wanted.  He's amazingly talented, and I'm extremely happy with how it's turning out. 
No stairs unfortunately since I stopped living with my parents, but I preferred my method [of descending the stairs](http://imgur.com/MPFOP.png) growing up.
I won't believe it until I see the stadium on the official site holding the shirt.
The Giants-Patriots Super Bowl had one of the best finishes, but for 3.75 quarters, the game was awfully boring.
It's like if an AFC spends 10 minutes chating to a cute girl in a bar one night, this is a major event in his life. He can't stop thinking about her.  When you think about it, this is ridiculous. He barely knows her. It was just a 10 minute chat from her perspective, since having chats like this with men in bars is probably common place to her. Since it's so rare for him, he places way too much stock in the interaction.  Since I've opened many sets and dated multiple women at the same time, a 10 minute chat in a bar with a girl now seems meaningless to me. To happens too often to be significant.
Luckily for the human race, most of these guys are probably removing themselves from the gene pool with their stunts.
[He is Liam.](http://www.geog.ucsb.edu/events/department-news/542/confessions-of-a-volunteer-tourist/)  [Credit where Credit is due.](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/dkyxd/is_that_is_that_a_worm_ಥ_ಥ/c10z6yy)
My walls are without rhythm, so they won't attract the worms.
I kid, I kid.  I'm sure your resume is fine.
But would r/conspiracy be interested in him? This article's votes seem to be ambivalent about that (I got 7 upvotes for asking something similar - that's not a lot of enthuseasm).
I still think the best idea was: hire male strippers to dance among them as they protest.  Cheap.  Hilarious.  Youtubable.  Will piss them off.
Well aren't you all that and a bag of chips. 
I saw 5 of the question in the Times today (knew them all). I had about 5 repeats in the 15 questions. 14/15 right.
Hahaha, I searched for "everything's okay," vaguely hoping it'd say something like "everything's *not* okay" (don't ask me, it made sense at the time), and this showed up at the very top:  [Elliott Smith - Everything's Okay](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gF9MUnkIlQc)  I think Google is crying for help.
photoshopped pussy lips...awesome
regardless of how we all hate digg, this ad barely even makes sense, do they think the majority of people check their email while on the couch? 
i seen someone with this strange communications device which took moving paintings of the world and could show you the moving paintings again at a different time. could they possibly have deployed one of these devices which may or may not exist?
That's how I felt when the world fell into ruin after the floating continent.
I'm surprised he actually did the heimlich maneuver correctly, aside from adding a little extra oomph at the end.
Then guy calling the plays has a different brain to, ya know. Offensive strategy involves a lot of in game reaction to what the other team is doing and each and every person who has ever called an NFL game does it differently. Bill Walsh was the master of mid-game adjustments and don't underestimate the value that had on the record. 
25 m²! When I went to Toulouse as a student, I was given 9 m² room in a shitty ancient student accommodation situated next to the biggest and most crime ridden Algerian ghetto in Europe and I had to pay €180 a month for it. Some said that it was worth the price I paid, but I remind the that criminals get much larger rooms for free.
They all died in the fire.
Too many electric moves. Also, get rid of thunderpunch. Ampharos's attack isn't high enough to utilize it.   If you are just playing in game, I would go thunderwave/ charge beam/ focus blast/ thunderbolt or stealth rock.  Charge beam the first few attacks until you get a boost, heal, then sweep with thunderbolt and focus blast!
What asshole downvoted this? It's accurate. Look for yourself.
Too fucking slow. I desperately wanted to like this show, but after watching several episodes I had virtually no desire to continue.  *Three Days of the Condor* and *The Parallax View* work because they're movies. Rubicon is paced so slow it is unwatchable.
Trolling
We sound like addicts in here.
Thank you :)
Not only do I put my certs in my signature, I put them in blink AND marquee tags.
Do the police have your DNA on file?
Higher end large-format printers have such a beast.
don't they have more important things to worry about?
for the cockney accent...  NOUGHT EENUFF CASH...straynja.
[No, this is what they're made of.](http://29.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_l9hc319GNU1qar86bo1_500.jpg) Edit: Disregard 
Nutritional yeast is one of those things I would avoid buying in too much bulk. I usually buy 1-3 months worth at a time. 
If you don't think someone can be killed with a thrown brick: http://www.wxii12.com/news/24555415/detail.html
Thanks genius.  I was trying to say that although weed is illegal and people smoke it anyways, we shouldn't do it at the rally in front of all the cameras.  
half-full ;)
True enough.
Well I was just about ready to type it out, then [This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XXq5VvYAI1Q) started playing and I just cant do it.   Turns out im not much of an emotionless hardass after all, bugger.
In Middle School I had to make a presentation on The Hobbit so instead of writing a book report or making a shadow box like everyone else, I brought in a copy of Moby's "Travel so Hard" and told everyone before I hit play that it was what I envisioned playing while the hobbits searched for the ring. Liberal teacher loved it, I got an A+ and that started my career in trolling. :)
Everyone is entitled to their opinion.  My opinion is it sounds like you have a dickhead of a brother.
...I'm calling the cops.
Why was this downvoted? Oh well, I liked it. 
It's about time you check the new prices. 30$ for 6 gigs and 10$ to share the plan with the iPad. From there you get a cheap voice plan and a skype account
Well then you'll have no problem EXTERMINATING THIS OWL!
Meh. But great teeth!
Support for teledildonics is a must.
[Dildroid](http://www.mobidroid.com/products/dildroid) ftw.
Did you mean: *Squirtle Squad*?
If a cyclist stops at a stop sign, look up.  You'll see a pig flying.
I knew it was Dave Grohl all along.
he must have been talking with steve jobs
you can sleep in my living room but your girlfriend will have to sleep with me. i live right on teh green line
The Pretty Reckless - Miss Nothing  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hFlHsKExcYg&amp;ob
Now that they're flat. *sniff sniff*
Some of the people over at zombiehunters.org sometimes get together to do this.  http://zombiehunters.org/forum/viewforum.php?f=38&amp;sid=986042b092d2bd1f04881ae2db962b9c  They have different chapters for different parts of the country. Some of them will do mock bugouts and get together for camping, shooting, and tactics type stuff.
This is what you get for majoring in sociology.
And warm apple pie.
Several of those are statements, not questions, but yes, theists often have trouble understanding the difference
Exchange it for bills at small businesses.  They always need change, and you won't have to pay a fee like you would at those machines.  
The senate is a bunch of old people who generally detest loud noises.  I'm not that surprised.  GET OFF MY LAWN!
Baconnaise is... ugh. I will either make mayo with bacon grease from my frozen storehouse of goodness or just crumble bacon and mix into regular mayo. What's so hard about that? Plus you get to quality control your meat. Calling this shit *bacon*naise is a lie. It's smoke-flavor-aise.   edit: but I did enjoy a small bit of bacon salt on my egg. It's not bacon but it gives a little added flavor. Not as good as frying an egg in bacon fat, but not disgusting.
has anyone ever gotten that to work for a yahoo music video?  the following command made from a stream found in   /tmp/plugtmp/plugin-getPlaylistFOP.php just gives:  Connecting ... INFO: Connected... ERROR: Closing connection: NetStream.Failed  command:  rtmpdump -o out -r 'rtmp://s1sflod002.bcst.cdn.s1s.yimg.com/StreamCache/r14/014/ads/114717069.flv?StreamID=114717069&amp;pl_auth=601f393f4c9dd0eb11dbbdea956d17f5&amp;ht=600&amp;b=69gmm1d66dacl4ca4f820&amp;ai=6217025&amp;do=YAHOO&amp;io=779556.14346254.14225053.13761367&amp;pg=MTk0ODAxNDY3NzRjYTRmOD&amp;po=BMPR&amp;pr=lnchcom&amp;pv=P9tB.mKIcnlkwtYLTGaplQduTP2E9kyk.B8ADXks&amp;q=dvUT1ojns4PsVtHF3pbc9p&amp;sl=5&amp;so=%2F&amp;sp=BMPR'
Just to elaborate, "goes to half physical memory" refers to this (from `man mount`):   Mount options for tmpfs   size=nbytes       Override  default  maximum  size of the filesystem.  The size is       given in bytes, and rounded up to entire pages.  The default  is       half  of  the memory. The size parameter also accepts a suffix %       to limit this tmpfs instance to that percentage of your physical       RAM:  the default, when neither size nor nr_blocks is specified,       is size=50%  That means there's a hard limit on the amount of virtual memory a tmpfs mount will take up.  (When I first read your comment, I thought you were saying tmpfs had a limit on how much RAM it took up before it started swapping, rather than a limit on how big it can be total before it starts returning `ENOSPC`.)
&gt;and such as  Upvoted for Miss North Carolina.
Melba Toast. I have no idea why, it barely has any taste, but if I fucking love it. 
I think it can be. People don't necessarily make their profiles open by choice, or with the intention of being searched out. Just a couple of months ago wasn't there a flap of how FB made it very challenging to make your account fully private? I remember loading up a script that found certain settings were still open despite my thinking that everything was private. I also wouldn't put it past a company such as this to have underhanded tactics to mine information that they shouldn't have access to. The other problem is the friends who post everything online with labels. So despite trying to control my end, I can't control there's or sometimes even know that it exists. Also, there are/were accounts that I had opened on FB, Myspace and other Social Networks 5-10 years ago when this wasn't an issue. I've since forgotten about there existence or the login info, and there's nothing I can do about it. So unless there's a way for me to scrub things off the details off the net that I basically don't have access to, I think that it is an invasion of privacy to a degree. Plus I don't think that personal details that they're looking for are relevant to work. There is a work me, where I try to behave in a socially acceptable manner, and am focused on work. And then there is a private me, where I don't want to have to worry about work, or what the corporate overlords may think.
Have you ever bought a ward?  As a followup question, can I touch you?
I would like to post my true opinion about these, however I am sure it would buried.
As it happens, you can. Right before I broke up with him, he had just this IMPOSSIBLE multicolored crater of a zit on his nose and a faint red stripe going up his forearm. Turns out the stripe was blood poisoning. His next girlfriend had to call me and be like "uh, so you know, dude has nose herpes." I felt...so many emotions.
my eyes are bleeding from my stupidity being suddenly increased dangerously.
The problem is that the sound was originally mixed to sound good in a large space (i.e. a movie theater) on a multi-channel sound system with plenty of power behind it.  And, yeah, this can sound great on a large home-audio system in an environment where you don't care how loud the movie gets. If somebody else is asleep and you don't want to disturb them or if you live in an apartment / condo and don't want to disturb your neighbors, you're out of luck.  If you have small/underpowered  home audio system or you just want to listen using the TV's built-in speakers, you're also often out of luck. Yes, even on a cheap surround receiver, you can usually work around this issue (a bit) by raising the center channel volume and lowering the other channels.  But this can be a chore because settings that sound right for one movie frequently sound terrible on the next one. The auto-volume feature on most TV's doesn't usually provide enough compression to help, either.  It really should be a continuously variable control so you can pick how much compression you need rather than a simple on/off setting.  I think the ideal solution would be a secondary (probably stereo-only) audio track where the original movie audio was remixed with a much more limited dynamic range.  **tl;dr:** Blu-rays and DVD's should have a secondary audio track with limited dynamic range for use when watching at night or with the TV's built-in speakers.
Did he go onto become a successful accountant for Haliburton after that?
Between the jelly dong rape I just witnessed and the Irish handstack jackoff that was posted yesterday... I'm noticing a serious uptick in bro on bro action on Reddit lately. 
Could be a good call on that. You'd think it would be hard for him to make it back into the team with competition for spots being so intense at the pies. I think he'll probably get another crack at it in 2011 but he'll need to lift considerably to make it beyond that.
It *is* still a funeral.  Strippers are in fairly poor taste, probably almost as bad as protests.
"Points were deducted for being rude or Canadian."  I could see points being deducted for being a "Rude Canadian", but that just doesn't happen ;)
I think a SAHP knows that. But some days it's very very hard. 
I have a nothing but Decemberist's playlist. I love it.
Alternativly, you can just have a ball removed, works just as well.
'so but' is horribly underused in this country.
I honestly have no idea why I found that so entertaining. 
Ha.  That brings to mind a time I was yelled at by a girl on a bike.  "Don't ride on the sidewalk, use the road!" she yells.  I'm thinking "WTF?  I just pulled off the road to dismount and hit the grocery store."  I understand caring about bicycling and its image (too many people riding on the sidewalk, all cyclists look bad), but there's a point where you have to sit back and let life and culture evolve without your unneeded activism.  
More Democrats in the House and Senate voted for the bill than Republicans.  It was a fully bipartison piece of garbage.
Humans are always humans, but not all humans are nice.
Eh, I don't know man. That seems to be the main problem; a basic lack of understanding that different folks got different strokes. Referring to people as 'faggots' or 'fat ass (or skinny ass)' loses the argument.  Also, I laughed pretty hard at 'REDDIT, I FEEL SO DEPRESS'  What's his point other than he doesn't like some people's view?
&gt; 1) for the sake of atheism is bit of a contradiction in terms, but if anything fits, these do. Stalin killed priests, leveled churches, and persecuted, killed, or sent to the gulag thousands of believers. Mao didn't have much of a church to destroy, but to establish himself as supreme he abolished any other belief None of which establishes that either of them committed those atrocities in the name of atheism.  All it establishes is that they consolidated their power, which included getting rid of any potential competition from religion. &gt; 2) this is not the not true scottsman fallacy. this is one of several passages in the Bible about false Christians That is *precisely* the definition of the No True Scotsman fallacy. &gt; 3) as for Mark 16:17-18, generally speaking, this is a statement to the apostles regarding the power they, and those they convert will walk in. Why the powers of the Holy Spirit (Spiritual gifts) have declined or decreased, I do not know. The passage doesn't limit the context to only the Apostles.  "And these signs shall follow them that believe" is pretty all-encompassing to all believers.  So, healed the sick lately?
It reminds me of some kind of messed up Rapture haha
yes, I used blender for a few years and quit 5 or 6 years ago. I never got close to this, some people have amazing talent
The site shows a vacancy for a *Senior Graphic Designer*.
Fuck. If no one is home I poop in the garden. It's my house.
Let me add +1 person to the category of cool ppl from Alberta!   I should revise my opinion I expressed about Albertans elsewhere in here.  :)
To be fair you should be an equal opportunity hater...because everybody hates you.
Oh, you're back..  First.. I don't give a shit what people think.. I am an individual..  so take your Beck shit and stick it up your ass.. You fucking censors can eat shit.. and I hope you enjoy it.. You don't know me... and your ignorant assumptions are entirely wrong..   don't try to classify me..  You must be an American.. 
&gt;tomatos are fruit do no cook them.  have you never had a baked apple
Wow, thanks for the responses everyone!  A couple things I forgot to mention: I don't eat fast food unless I absolutely have to.  I only drink water or diet soda (rarely).  I haven't had non-diet soda in roughly 2 years. I'm 6'0", 280 lbs. I've been overweight since around middle school, about 11 years ago. I played junior varsity and varisty football, wrestling, and track, but have never been able to lose the weight. Over the past 5 years, I've varied between 310 and 275, but have never been able to get below 275.   
Lol another "very high" fellow ent!
if i'm wrong...congrats on having awesome pussy lips
Step 1:  negotiate a lower payment  Step 2: (regardless of how step 1 went) Tell them, do not let them tell you what you can pay for a payment.  Do not, I mean NOT, share your personal income or bank statements.  They are a hospital, not accountants.  Step 3: Pay the payments  Step 4:  If you can not pay the payments because you lost your job, renegotiate a payment plan.
Who doesn't?
I registered just to add this comment.  I might be the only one to say it, but do not get a paternity test.  Do not.  It is completely irrelevant at this point.  No good can come of finding out that someone else fathered it.  The kid is yours, period.  You've been raising it for years, I assume, so no need to run down that rabbit hole. As for the rest of your problem, it sounds like you might be slightly overreacting.  Yeah, she lied about searching for the guy, but it may be because she was worried about this exact reaction.  I say sit down and have an honest discussion with her about your feelings and concerns.  Try to keep it calm.
same here!
Sorry I can't tell if you're being sarcastic over the internet.  The choice of image used for the post on /int/ is a variant on this [meme](http://bbsimg.ngfiles.com/1/14676000/ngbbs4749345fa89cf.jpg).
I THINK THIS BROAD IS PRETTY HOT TBH
Youtube [*can*](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dEIcNpxChI4&amp;has_verified=1#t=40m56s) have breasts showing actually, there's quite a few on there, but nothing at all pornographic, and I doubt any user submitted content will be allowed either as I do believe that's against the TOS.
You just made me throw up my Pringles =/.
Came here to say this, but my works was already done. 
I'll try reaching out to the mods again.  I have only posted about five things, two of which got over 200 upvotes. So it wasnt spam :)
LUVZ IT!
I'm in love with your brother in law.
And the rest were... goat porn? Well what were they, worse stuff? 
I have another target for them - [godhatesfags.com](http://www.godhatesfags.com/)
Given the civilian casualty rate from USA missile attacks in Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Yemen, Somalia, they must need a high speed printer being used full time to churn out letters of apology to next of kin.  If they actually cared....
Yup, when you step away from the extremist nonsense, science and religion actually can, and do, coexist peacefully. 
OH SHIT! I DON'T KNOW HOW THAT HAPPENED. LINK HERE: http://www.flickr.com/photos/boriskafka/5032999946/  WILL EDIT ABOVE. SORRY!
Just the fact that he took the 10 bucks shows that he was still being a dick.
LOL just be glad you didn't have to go through army training
I'd be amazed if it didn't.
1st of tha month.
Who's terminal? That shifty guy you're buying a 2nd hand guitar from?   Yeah, he looks legit.
You have a very nice sister. Congrats.
Yes, but I think that's not the full story. If I recall correctly it was initially delivered via USB and also spread via USB, but it mostly spread via networks. I remember it used quite a number of independent zero-day exploits, but I don't know/remember their functions.
Oh, okay. I guess most Americans spend every morning in the bathroom puking up blood and require a litre of vodka to function. 
Because that is exactly what you need on a range.  Please.  You are nuts.  This legislation is mainly geared to ranges that fuck up the environment.
Yeah but when it's not youtube it's vimeo, when it's not vimeo it's grooveshark, megavideo, facebook... I'm not patient :)
It was a bust of Kevin Bacon completely made out of bacon.
well thats the fault of those european countries then. progressive is the dictionary definition of liberal.
Mine too! They are coming around though. 
Because its a ladder game and he's probably practicing a strategy that doesn't involve going mutas?  And idra's attack timings were fine.  You can't a-move into turtled terran players unless you either have the forces necessary to break or hate winning and like watching your units die.
Actually there is a burger chain, at least in NYC, that sells Krabby Pattys. [Good Burger, home of the Good burger.](http://www.goodburgerny.com/) Yes, like Kenan and Kel. Their burger is actually delicious, I have not tried the Krabby Patty.
Also, there's some really encouraging and helpful people in /r/fitness
Awesome! Either you are really small or that is one massive bible :) What translation is it?  So awesome for playing along.
Marriage is a lot of things, but one of them is a live legal concept.  It is the concept of a romantic partnership. Much like a business partnership, you combine two entities into one. In a romantic partnership, you combine to economic individuals into one, so that they may make joint economic decisions as a unit. It is a useful concept because it frees the partnership to make decisions in the interest of the partnership instead of as individuals.  For example, the partnership may choose to invest all its money into one 401(k), or put all its resources into the more promising of the two careers while the other partner maintains the home life.  The state sets standard terms of the romantic partnership, but they may be freely altered via prenuptial agreement.  It's funny because that's the second time an MRA has told me they want a contract about what happens when the partnership splits. That's what marriage is, like a business partnership most of the terms are about what happens when the partnership dissolves. Edit: As far as women taking the house, this is a wide spread myth.  Whoever takes the house will have to pay the other partner half of its value in other assets.  Usually if the couple cannot agree who takes the house, it is sold and the proceeds are split.
That's a bit vague.  Do you have any specific questions or problems?  The FAQ might be a good place to start - are any of the topics there of any help to you?  You might like to check out the iron chariots wiki as well, particularly the arguments for god.  If you still think there might be a god, can you explain why?
Buy $500 worth of Somethings at http://somethingstore.com.   Bam, giant collection of shit.
dank U big word hurd brainface make me think bad....
I use demonoid.
Full vid?
Wow, that's amazing!  Don't ever say Congress doesn't get things done...  Sincerely, Not Passing a Budget...
Now I'm going to think about this every time I'm walking down the street.  "That person is visualizing what would happen if they hit me."
I believe that steampunk began as an offshoot of cyberpunk, the latter of which was actually influenced by the 80s punk movement.  
You wanna know why the War on Terror™ is taking so damn long to win?  ...because not enough of our troops have the guts that this guy does; the guts to do what is necessary to the enemy. Bravo to you, sir, America needs more like you.
I do sometimes at my house when nobody is looking...sometimes I also go down the stairs that way. I'm 22, and I'm not ashamed of it. My inner child remains happy.
Now that's a blonde I could go for.
Is that so? It does sound fairly nice, but if that negative space is so damn useful why don't we see it more often?
Classic case of misdirection.  Are you an illusionist?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UKXKJc5DmT4&amp;feature=player_embedded
Pro: you're not in that goofy [recumbent capsule.](http://images.gizmag.com/gallery_lrg/9678_23070862248_11.jpg) Con: you're not in that [safe, enclosed capsule.](http://images.gizmag.com/gallery_lrg/9678_23070862247_9.jpg)  Hmm...
horribly written.
No, I *miss*read it.
Sigh, sucks living in GMT timezone think the live stream happens @ 3am over here?  Anyway Day[9] is great, as a newb he makes it fun to watch sc2 replays and helps you learn the essentials. Much no-homo love I have for him.
Strange name for a parent corporation, you'd think they'd pick a name that didn't have so many random letters in it.
Yeah, I saw that. I was pretty disappointed.
This was posted in July of 2009 as well.  How do I know?   There is a print out of it pinned to my wall.  Whenever I have writer's block I look up at it and read it again.  Just to get the idea in my head that if that can be published, so can I.  Then I get back to work.
There is no right in the world. There is only hatred and vengeance. 
Physics engine: "Uh, oh shit! His body's intersecting the rail? What do I do?"  Collision handler: "Resolve this in the fastest way possible!"  Physics engine: "Uhh, okay." velocity = velocity + 50000 "Whew, almost let the player know I screwed up there."
Maybe it's dead for your friend, but you say it isn't for you. Here's a thought: only get married if you want to. If you don't want to get married, don't get married.  That said, sometimes it's a moot point. I have a couple of friends who are in a long term monogamous (as far as I know) relationship which they both intend to stay in for a long time. Hell, they've even bought a house together. Now the female in the couple is wondering whether she should back down from her fiercely anti-marriage position. I say, what does it matter? Your friends and family already know where you stand. The only thing marriage will do is put your relationship on a government form, bringing some benefits and some drawbacks. 
I have some invites to [Forrst](http://forrst.com/) if you're interested. **Lots** of great feedback to get from there for both designers and developers. PM your email to me and I'll send an invite.  I haven't used it personally but I have some friends who use [Concept Feedback](http://www.conceptfeedback.com/) quite a bit. They just recently switched from being completely free so I'm not sure if they still use it. Worth a look though.
I'm in for this year. I'm a prep monster, so I'll be using October as NaNoPlaMo. I do some Snowflake, some mapping, and probably too much worldbuilding, if last year was any indication. On the up side, I won in 7 days last year too. No shortage of drive over here.
Is it like food stamps? Can they be traded for cash like in the US?
No, it does.  That's why water is considered the universal solvent.  Ethanol won't dissolve sugar for example, which is why it messes up your engine when you pour it into your gas tank.
No body needs 4 gallons of jizz, ever. I call shens.
Fun Fact: I bought my first gun precisely because of these wackos.  Not that I'm planning to fight against them (and certainly not with them), but if they start a race war or something I'm planning on staying the hell out of everyone's way until the dust settles and I'll probably need to hunt my own food for awhile.
hustle, real hard, hustle hustle, real hard
Nope...I'm 22. I was 19 when I was at my worse. My problem was where the behavior stemmed from. I was raped when I was 17 and never told anyone until I was 19.  I consider recovered being that I know my behavior was inappropriate and that I can express my needs in different ways...I am secure with myself. I know that my boyfriend will never hurt me like I was hurt before. Pretty much, you need to realize what your actions are and go through the process of "why I shouldn't think/do this." 
It's as hot as I expected. ;) Speedcum?  I wouldn't mind causing or seeing that either. 
[From Engadget, one of the first results from Googling "Thneed"](http://www.engadget.com/2008/04/16/the-body-laptop-interface-is-knitted-from-thneed-which-nobody-n/3)
broke policy... streamed media at work... it was worth it.  edit: still breaking policy, this'll [Hurt](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o22eIJDtKho&amp;feature=related)
Should be okay, if the clams were thoroughly cooked. Although I shudder to think of eating two-day-old noodles.
My B12 supplement gives 100 mcg. 1000 seems like too much.   What do you mean by variable?
Someone should tell that dude it's "Crips", not "Crypts"
I had the Vintage Tyrolean before it was double vintage.   But no, not especially. I feel more like a hipster with my trendy little pyro bow tie.
Me
cock scene.
Did you stick those giant candles in it? 
That argument doesn't say christianity is right though.  There are other choices, so if you go by the odds any single choice is wrong.
radio telescope arrays are where its at.
Fucking anti-Semites.  Wait, what?
Probably because the language pack that comes with Joomla is a UK version... I think the US feels left out.
This exhibit is closed!
See, I never said I put a weiner in my mouth...that's just your fantasy getting carried away.
Judgment Day and Ocean Breeze are the ones I've tried. Judgment Day is the worst shit I've ever done, it's fucking terrible. Ocean Breeze was OK, but still nowhere near as good as the real thing.
Don't give her ideas!!
Yeah, you are kind of like a novelty to some people. "Hey John!  Get this, Joe here, doesn't eat meat!  WTF AMIRITE?" It happens, but after a while it gets lulzy.  Just be cool baby.  Still, yes, it is going against the norm.  Thats why people get weird.  Anyways, it's not really the person getting all weird it is the virulent thought strain trying to defend itself.  It is under attack after all. Good luck! (why are you vegie anyways?  We can share stories because we are the same tribe lol)
Mushrooms. Anywhere.
First, I never asked for him to buy me a trip. I was making a statement as I had just found out yesterday that I won't be able to see her.  Second, why do you assume I'm a brat? Because I'm poor? Because I've worked my arse off and am good enough for Cambridge? Because I assume I am?  Third, I *am* dating her.
It's okay, you can borrow my ID.
that dude is rolling so hard
Awful tinny word.
Sure, it's understandable to long for more episodes. But give me a British show where each individual series always has some closure vs. a US show potentially getting shit-canned on a cliffhanger any day. It's simply a more sensible system of series television.
Striking resemblance.
It douse not say so on your profile. 
Ah HA! So everyone was right!
Adding "literary" in there makes that statement gramatically correct, which means it has lost its inherent troll value.
theres nothing better than banging a fat bitch when your in the middle of a dry spell..
Sidevoted for using too many paired consonants in a single sentence.
Trust me, if it was too long, I wouldn't expect anyone on /r/trees to read it. [3]
I attempted t do what you wanted but it didnt even allow it to be processed for some reason... stating that it encounters complex infinity and other things which are not present in regular plot.   Also from what I saw in the documentation center it doesnt look like it would fix the problem.  My y-axis is currently m and my x axis is h. I need a method of producing h on the y axis and m on the x axis without trying to find the inverse of the function.
Meh, you have to wear all three pieces. Lets look at the solly for example. You now only have 3 rockets and you don't have a backup shotgun for +20% defense against sentries...that you only have 3 rockets to hit with. If an engi is behind it, don't even think about destroying it.  Also, you do get the +35% defense to your team, but that's after taking a shit ton of damage. And you STILL only have 3 rockets. Sure you get +15 health per rocket hit, but shit still trying to kill a heavy is fucking near impossibe.  Sniper gear- Yeah you can't get headshotted, but you also can't 1 hit kill anyone with a headshot anymore. It seems pretty fair.  Edit: These items haven't even been out for a day. Give it some time to start complaining.
[google cache](http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:iTi4ZnU5Hx8J:chris-armstrong-watch.blogspot.com/+http://chris-armstrong-watch.blogspot.com/&amp;cd=2&amp;hl=en&amp;ct=clnk&amp;gl=us) 
Never have so few done such great damage to so many.   Thanks DICK!
Cheese basically is mold.  Bleu cheese is just double-cheese.
It's too symbolic of canon for me. And the tattoo will probably outlive that design, so it'll lose its relevence. 
"Willfully" amazed? Why will yourself to become amazed in this situation? I would think amazement would sort of manifest itself.
Not only is Dale M. Courtney a noted and gifted writer and artist (I assume he's the one that photoshopped random planets and that spherical part of the spaceship from 2001 onto his book cover) but he also has a fine brain for health care policy as well. Behold his plan for healthcare reform:  *How many times have you heard that one person has just won 150,000,000.00 million dollars in the Power Ball lottery. My system divides all of the winnings in that one category into as many winners as possible which helps more people and our Economy and all of the business’s everywhere. This is also a self funding system after initial start up costs.*  http://my.barackobama.com/page/community/post/dalecourtney/gGGGB5/commentary
Let's pretend you become permanently disabled tomorrow.  The social security kicks in.  Feel like an asshole now?
Do it and post for many upvotes and internet high fives.
This is the monster you have created you hat loving fucks.
All of those are fixable. :)
Its a good argument, but in a voluntary society, the only remaining claim would be from a historical transgression.  The 'thief' stealing food now can only make this claim.  If the neighbor is the bossman in a circa 1920 Virginia coal mine and his laborer steals some food to eat, then this guy's claim is much like you describe.  Technically the laborer is free to leave, but unofficially he is bonded.   Who decides?  Well I guess we have to answer how is crime handled in a voluntary society?  Who enforces?  These are the ones who will ultimately decide.  The enforcers.  They will answer these gray areas.  They will resolve the issues.
&gt; Can't skip the DirectX question  Yes, you can. Just change the shortcut to the appropriate executable file in your game folder.
Exactly.  That is sort of what I was implying in my post about Ammonia.  That is one of its advantages.
This isn't a bad movie though.
When halfwits ask me if I "know Jesus", I reply "Yeah!  We used to go out drinking every Thursday, until he 'got religion'."
The default privacy settings for facebook are wide open, you have to manually change them.  What is worse, each time they update their server, and the never tell you when they do that, the settings revert to the default of "everyone can see your stuff."
Apparently your spell check also completes all of the punctuation and capitalization for you as well, since it appears you forgot how to do it.
The problem with religion is that it can't admit it's man-made.  If someone came out and said "in my religion, we believe that a zebra created the world and can do anything, but that doesn't matter, since we just made it up for the lulz," they would not get many followers.  But preach fire and brimstone, make war on non-believers, and torture dissidents for not taking the zebra seriously, and you will soon have followers.
What were you doing there, may I ask?
Where are you?  In San Antonio, TX, there is a place called 210Geeks.com [yes, the store is called that too].  I got (2) 160GB WD raid edition drives for $40.  They sent me an email September 18th with this line in it  &gt; DELL GX240 Tower.  P4 w/ XP Pro.  $49.99
Digg 5.0. 
I see people make room all the time for a well-placed blinker and I live in LA. What DOESN'T work is turning on your blinker when there's no room at all and waiting for everyone else to fix your problem.  I'm not saying you do this, just saying I see it a lot from others. I make no effort to make room for those people.
Someone photoshop this image.
I have the qwest 40 down service right now.  It is not 40 down.  I get maybe 10~12 on avg, but coming from both broadstripe and Clear, I gotta say its not bad.  (I am only paying the 29.99 intro fee though, otherwise its just a ripoff).  Comcast has always been much easier to extend or TOS intro fees.
Now that I *have* successfully trolled you, I guess I'll ask a real question: at what age do you think someone is self-aware enough to make a statement about their heterosexuality/homosexuality?
There are, but I've never gotten any greater shuffle range out of them. They may be placebo. I reset the play counts, which works for a short time, but within a week I find it's back to same old songs.
Grew up in westchester
be human.  **edit** a humane human.
I do think boys don't get to be 'boys' in the playground so much any more with all of those 'no running, no climbing, no being adventurous in any way'  rules. I think perhaps the first chance boys get to be daring these days is when they get behind the wheel of a car and I've wondered if this is why we have such an increase in 'hooning'.
True. He's my brother though and he makes me laugh.
Standing ovation.
Cools. My wife does a quasi dance thingy to that song. It's part of her zumba class. Sadly, I do not feel that I will be able to learn the dance in time for the flash mob deal.
Jesus did live - we have history to prove it.  Even the Jews acknowledge he lived.  Also, why does it matter if we started counting at that point?  Wouldn't it be the same if we just picked some random event to start counting?
Seriously, any ideas of what's going on in this picture?  Edit: Thanks for the source, wwabc and broken computer, I found the page it came from. I see 419 eater stuff sometimes but hadn't seen this one yet. 
Apparently the Avs fans don't like hearing the truth about the Pepsi Center being so empty all the time. Down vote all you like. It won't fill that place up for you.
Really? 'Cause I can't get it to smelt my Refined Metal.  Er... hmm. That's really odd. I gave it Reclaimed and Backburner... and it smelted my Reclaimed. And took my Backburner. :(
Your argument is so wrong it hurts.  Just restate it while swapping the sexes. Suddenly, it becomes unacceptable... I wonder why.
I've been putting apples in my salads the last few months. Best addition I could have made. 
I've never thought of that, that's a great idea.
good point man. i just cant imagine living next to somebody who does it that much. i mean im a stoner but come on.. tell them to go outside and play Frisbee or something.
Yeah RooshV really seems to have a chip on his shoulder about American women. Some of his early stuff on his blog was good, it seems to be going down hill now.
cool!
Really? I rather love netwroking.
What nitwit didn't have Obama's act down when he ( as a Senator ) flip-flopped on unlawful domestic surveillance?
It's hard to bait the master baiters.
I think he focused more on giving time than money.  That was part of the issue with the AD and some of the big donors, he was distracted form the team and it showed on the field. But if I got a job offer from even my arch nemesis at a 100% increase in salary, I would jump at it.  Anyway, as bad as we have looked so far (and our teams have to be the two worst looking 4-0 teams in the country), I am excited to go into a season not knowing what to expect.  Haven't had that since 2002 or so.
I would too. Logically, it makes sense that the (apparently) only guy behind the counter won't be someone else.
Heh.
What the hell another stupid cat picture why do I click on.. oh goddamn it, that's cute. 
I figured this company was in some little podunk town somewhere in CA, but no, it's in the bay area.  I live right across the bay from this company.  I thought the bay was better than this.  Sigh.
if you are using acracked version,  it probably isnt owrking because the crack sucks. Buy the game. the library that java uses has a problem wth your display driver- LWJGLException: X Error.  This mihgt help, http://www.java.com/en/download/help/5000021200.xml Also, what version is the crack? Buy the game.
The only way to vote out the business interests is to vote 3rd party.  Dems and Reps have been in the pocket of big business for a while.
Godspeed traveler.
They included Soulja Boy but no Wu Tang or NWA?
oh mann, you have good taste! 
wow! reddit does have everything!
Gustav Holst   The Planets - Jupiter  3:04 in on this video:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L6NopU9K_8M
Drink.
Go on...  Pick your best / fave / whatevs =P
Too bad I carry a gun in my car.
No disrespect meant, but I don't see why human limitations imply a need for redemption. Why not a need for progress and development - by our own means?
  Down'd &amp; rpr'd
OK, thanks for that info. Must just be my imagination.
I like the cut of your jib! I've been reading all this crap about cyber bullying and the WBC, and it's nice to see some humanity for a change. Good job man.
Isn't Billy Mays dead? 
I have some basil growing, so I don't have to buy that.  I have never added it to salad dressing personally, although I have thrown some in my salads here and there.  Dried basil is obviously going to last longer, but is not as tasty.  If you are mixing a batch and storing for later use, I think the best thing is to store it in the fridge.  At which point the oil gets a little thick and you have to pull it out of the fridge a bit before you use.  I usually only mix enough dressing for my one salad.  If I am batching, I don't make more than 2 or 3 salads worth.  Another pro-tip - buy the Mexican spices.  So much cheaper.
Sorry for your loss.
Yes, it's functional enough....   In about the same way a Boeing 747 is functional enough with it's wings  held together with nothing else then duct-tape.
From rotted throats of dead English teachers came the agonized cries of grammatical, punctuational, and organizational errors. Upon this instance, English students felt a chill run up their spines, and subsequently revised their past essays.
Exactly. There's a bit of a distance issue, not much, but still sufficient that both of us want to take it slowly and see if it's even worth it. Quite the girl, though.
*Pleasure* - I know this is a weird one but it just embodies terrible "erotica" for me    
Imagine having sex with him in a 110° room, with him on top, arms up on the headboard, banging away....
A Phone is only as "smart" as it's user.  Edit: That was bullshit- my phone is way smarter than A LOT of people.
Being a stay at home dad is not the same thing is being rich and chilling at home.
ISP = Internet Sperm Provider? Anyone want a montly subscription?
I'm not even gay, but I'd be willing to have public gay sex at his funeral to troll this bastard and his peeps.
To be honest I'd only regard it as a problem if the person wasn't in a relationship and was actively seeking out sleeping randoms to fuck whilst they themselves were asleep.  If you're in a healthy, stable, happy sexual relationship with the person and they don't have a problem with the idea, then it sort of ceases to become a concern.
pfft, yeah.
Where I went to school sixth grade through twelve rode the same bus,  when I was in ninth grade I brought some of my moms home made cookies to school, a sixth grader who lived down the street from me and I know lived a shelterd life, asked for one.  He thought they were the best cookies ever and said he had to know what they were called so his mom could buy some.  Somehow I convinced they were made by a company called grade a pussy,  and if he mentioned grade a pussy to his mom she would know excatly what he was talking about.  He actually ended up going home and asking his mom if she could get him some grade a pussy
Anarcho-capitalist....  really?  Did you really just say that?
This is a consequence of moving toward a business model of education where the administration is the CEO, teachers are the grunts, students the product, parents the customers, and "the customer is always right". 
Yea, even though I'm a bears fan, this was the best game of the last 10 years to me.   I understand the NE/NYG game was significant for many reasons, but this game was all out insanity.
Look at the names primarily.   If it's a common name with a lot of random numbers and there is no photo, it's a fake account. Check the visit dates and how they respond. It's more of a feeling them out sequence.   Never give out personal info and have a dedicated email for AFF only. 
Yeah, not like America. There they just call you a terrorist and shoot you.
You can get an aerospace engineering degree at night school?
Penis has a mind of it's own.
Yes, there are probably 45-50 that would go along with it.  Remember, this would be pretty much going back to what we had before the supreme court ruling.  And not even all the way, as it would be a cap, not a complete removal of the ability.  The problem is we need 60 votes.
Oh man, I had that comic!  I traded my whole collection for cash about 6 years later to buy a car.  It was nice, but I'd rather have the comics now.
My wife laughs at me for this.  I am 6'5" and it's easier to run up steps this way.
This is quite possibly the best advice I have ever read.
I haven't looked into digital tv (as I don't own one). I tried asking the technician that came to hook the cable up for the internet, and he mentioned something about how it could be because I'm in a condo. He also mentioned that the complex may not have a good enough CMTS serving it, and because we're a small market Roger's hasn't upgraded it. No one on the phone has been able to give me a good answer.
Based on the quality of line and your marks I'm fairly certain this was traced.
Student loans are not bankruptable. You're stuck with them. Get a job or 2 and work as much as you can to get the cash to pay for school.  It will be tough, but you're almost done.  After you graduate, live on nothing and put all of your money toward the debt. It sucks, but it's very doable.
Very cool.  Thanks.
Clark and Deming next door to Starbucks towards the lake. You?
I am a hipster on a GTB and I can trackstand for days.   I also derive great pleasure from watching a hipster on a track bike fall over at a stop light.
[...From the British Transport Police 'Rouges Gallery'.](http://www.btp.police.uk/about_us/history/crime_history/rogues_gallery.aspx)
I had to read Othello in high school and was bored, I went to see Hamlet as a play and loved it. It's the equivalent of kids in the 2100's reading the script of No Country For Old Men from a page and trying to analyse it.
If you're planning on voting the rascals out who voted for the Troubled Asset Relief Program and the Recovery Act stimulus, you might be interested in learning that together those programs [saved 8.5 million jobs](http://www.cbpp.org/images/2010.07.30econ-f2.jpg).
&gt; try it out and then criticize it.  Would work out better if you could actually stop using it after you try it out. Not unlike AOL, canceling facebook is rather difficult.
I got the same mail, twice within a week.
Ooooor a less batshit crazy explanation is simply that our primitive monkey brains can experience a wide range of sensory aberrations, hallucinations or heightened feelings of euphoria etc.   Yes, most phenomenon in history were given silly causes. And do you know what every single one of those things ended up being? NOT MAGIC. Further, the example you gave is actually a point AGAINST your worldview. You are the ignorant ye olde townfolk attributing a "mysterious" phenomenon to fairytales based on absolutely no evidence.   Creating a contradictory, unfalsifiable, unprovable, ever shifting concept to loosely throw over anything "unknown" is intellectually dishonest and an insult to the human quest for knowledge.  Anecdotes != evidence.
not attractive, but I would respect her more than the non athletic looking girls my caveman brain is wired to like..
Or a faked facebook argument about politics. One can't tell anymore. 
You did something there.  But, I don't see it.
I'd blame the book. 
I am not obliged to pay anything. If a country is run correctly it should be able to support itself. Taxation is stealing. Let them earn their money just like I earn mine.
Well, I've read reports of people being killed with writing utensils. That's really not the point, though.
I do, and I'll be sure to upload it first thing if I do a new post. If everything goes well and I get a positive response to this thread I'll probably start uploading monday.
Does Tiger really have a tiger pin on his jacket?
This has nothing to do with federal underfunding of bridges.  I-35 didn't collapse because the Interstate Highway system is underfunded.
[](/megustaperfect "Me gusta mucho!")
mmmm those fries look tasty
Just curious, have you ever tested the system on actual students? What kind of reaction have you gotten from them?
This is what's confusing to me though. What's to prevent someone from finding/crafting, say, the new sniper hat, and then selling on ebay? Wouldn't this create a market of finders/crafters who attempt to undercut Valve?
A phrase like "I could tell it was quite bad from the start" seems somewhat pretentious considering that its a subjective judgment passed off as a fact.
The SciFi novel Footfall.
"Wow, it's raining." Just to drive the conspiracy nuts crazy. 
This is true. The olden days weren't all glossy. NES was 90% shovel crap as well.
Amazing that anyone still believes the "terrorist" bullshit.
Hey girl! Can I have yo numbah? Yo numbah, can I have it please. May I have the 10 digits that comprise of yo area code and phone number?
The issue is when you step off campus and out of the bounds of the No Gun zone, you can, depending on the state, un-knowingly be surrounded by young adults that are CC'ing.  With that being the case there does not seem to be much evidence that they are brandishing or firing their weapons for small altercations.  Your argument comes off as ageism.  Your comments show your inability to trust young people due to the stereotypes that you hold about them.  Are some college students immature?  Yes.  However some 40 year old's are just as immature. It is easy to generalize and we all do it.  We have to realize that our views are not always correct and look to challenge them or back them up with evidence.  It is uncomfortable to be around people you don't trust but there doesn't seem to be any evidence to support that view point besides thinking up worst case scenarios.  In many of the cases you brought up there are laws against those actions and anyone, not just college students would face their CC license being revoked or even jail time.  I don't fear a college student going on a rampage due to failing a paper, and in the end feel that older students and teachers would end up being far more likely to CC.
Heh... I'm a bank teller.  They seriously frown on me taking my work home with me.  But even when I enter the education field, which is where I want to be, I'd prefer to take care of everything I need to in the classroom, even if it means staying for a while to get it done, so that I don't have to take things home with me if at all possible.
From Russia, with an Inconvenient Truth
FRANK??
When I used to work at a phone help desk, I used to find "new" ways to get people to re-do shit they claimed to have already done. Just give them a plausible sounding reason for why it may be different this time, and they're putty in your hands. Ex: "I just made a change on the server, we probably need to wait about 5 minutes, then restart your computer and see if it picks up the new setting."
its proper going up the stair etiquette. 
There's an option in the community settings that does this for you.  I believe it's "viewers must be over 18 years old" that sets it for you.
...Good thing three-month-olds don't clearly understand words and phrases. 
Well now you're just making up your own religion. 
&gt; Cui gives a shit. It's got a bow on it.
Even gives you a warning that there's nudity requiring you to sign into your account: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dEIcNpxChI4&amp;has_verified=1#t=40m56s
Go up the stairs like a slinky?
$20 credit towards another game costs the company nothing (the customer already paid the money, and you can't call it "lost sales" because he wouldn't have bought anything otherwise  Bad PR from the customer complaining to gawker/the consumerist/tabloid blogs is costly in both money and brand image.
You usually don't actually need any authority to shut down CP sites, as this posting demonstrated admirably.  A couple of emails from a random stranger, and they were taken down.
&gt; Implicit in the question is that it's a "[chicken] egg," Your childhood must've sucked.
[/r/trackers](http://trackers.reddit.com)
Mmmm, I'm a little bit lonely these days.
He was just saying that he though that every leap year, February extended in length by such.   The February++ comment was just giving an example of what he meant, as if February gained an extra day each time.
A 1960's boy band forms, gets famous and breaks up all while dealing with urban pressure and societal racism.
What do people do when you aren't around? And how do you keep them out of your stuff? (I know next to nothing about MP. Too busy with SP.)
Article I Section 8.  Again, this is going to go back to differences in the Elastic Clause and General Welfare Clause.  I would say that the powers enumerated in Section 8 are the limits on taxation and spending, for example, they collect taxes to administrate the powers listed.
There's FIV, the feline form of HIV, along with a few others (I couldn't find many good sources other than [this](http://www.fleascontrol.com/feline-aids.htm)) but it seems the general consensus is that they're transmitted more from biting, either during mating or fighting, than the actual intercourse itself.
ftr: do NOT run this. This will wipe your entire first hard drive.
Wonderful you're committing voter fraud and undermining the democratic system.  I hope you die in a fiery hell.  
I believe I'll have to try that... I do have a soft spot for crispy shredded beef in all its forms. :)  My big win for today is macadamia nuts -- bought 'em raw, so I brought them home, roasted them in a little butter, and salted them like they said nasty things about my mama. One of the carbier-tasting snacks I've had, and even fewer carbs than almonds. (Never been a huge fan of almonds myself... except Marconas. Mmmmm, Marconas.)
You should worry about [Local warming (ted talk)](http://www.ted.com/talks/yossi_vardi_fights_local_warming.html)
That game was great, but it frustrates me. Arizona was SUPPOSED to win. They were coming into the offseason as "the worst playoff team in history," and no one gave them a shot. They came out of nowhere with old Kurt Warner and a great defense, and got themselves to the Super Bowl. It was so storybook, but then the Steelers had to come and ruin it with a sixth stupid Lombardi trophy.
Meebo  Twitter  NYTimes  Read It Later  Evernote  Shazam / SoundHound  Downloads  IntervalTimer  Yelp
I used to drink 20 a day.  Not at all healthy.  You can do this.  Good luck.
I am associating capitalism with the state because the two are codependent partners and are inseperable.  What I am describing is the rise of capitalism and that process repeats itself to this day all over the world.  Likewise, capitalism colonizes our very lives and interactions as well, commodifying them and profiting off them, so I'm not even limiting myself to a description of its land-property relations, capitalism's cravings go quite beyond merely privatizing the land (when convenient).  In essence, I'm answering your question about why I associate capitalism with theft and violence.  The first reason is its history.  The second reason is everything that followed.  I think what you're running into is one of the big problems with so-called anarcho-capitalism: it, at the end, hates the initiatives of its victims while glorifying and excusing the attacks of the capitalist class.  It treats wealth as earned rather than stolen.  It treats capitals predations as natural, or even non-existent.  It mistakes coerced relations under capitalism for "freely associated" ones.  That's why it is not anarchist and never has been.  Anarchism is anti-capitalist.
I have lived in Hawaii for most of my life (born and raised), and never heard that one before.  Must be a thing among non-residents.  I had to look it up on Wikipedia to see if it existed.
It just doesn't make sense to me to have students who don't know anything about Shakespeare or Elizabethan drama (read: 90% of high school students) read a play that was meant to be watched. I can see that it's necessary to have the script handy so you can understand the language, but that's a whole different story from expecting kids to enjoy Hamlet or Romeo and Juliet without seeing any of the stage awesomeness that Shakespeare represents to me (as a teacher/bibliophile/Shakespeare fan).
I like how the OP is black.
We have long known that people are stupid. The question is why did they listen?
When someone jumps you, you don't really have time to hold down tab and check their items to see if you should fight or run, whether they have zhonya or deathfire etc.  I understand wanting it to be minimal, but to be honest, I think those two are too essential to cut out. Of course if it works for you, that's great.
Oh yeahhh it is! http://nugporn.com/
Sitting shiva begins after burial.  From [wiki](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shiva_(Judaism)): Immediately upon the burial of the departed (which in Judaism traditionally occurs within one day of death whenever possible), any first-degree relatives assume the halakhic status of "avel" (Hebrew: אבל ; "mourner"). This state lasts for seven days.
Part of why I got into this relationship was because of all the advice on here to just let loose and have fun, and it worked!  I think "have fun and be honest" is ultimately what I need to hear.  THanks
&gt;there are ALWAYS unwritten rules about who gets what spot.  Yeah. It's called "I got a permit to park here. Leave me the hell alone."
Thrice is awesome, and adding to your harder stack is [Theocracy](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=B24j9fnkxo4). Other than that, I also *really* like [Derek Webb](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mvQRd7D9BDM).
GET OUT!
I grew up in Boston and when I go on vacation I always go to Laconia, NH.   As far as cheap romantic hotels, I recommend the [Indian Head Resort](http://www.indianheadresort.com).  You can rent a very private bungalow for short money.   I'm not sure what your looking for activities, but there is jet-ski/boat rentals, a very clean beach and one of the best boardwalks on the east coast(including a classic gaming muesum).
Ain't you a smart boy.
You got the first two and Eyes is part of the third...but Angel Eyes is not the one I had in mind.
I'm not the organizer, and probably won't show up if it's on Sunday, but I'm pretty sure they won't ask for your student ID :P
If he was at a stop sign he had to give way to you.
That Glenn Beck is a manipulative person does not mean that he is being manipulative in this instance.  Your argument goes like this "I think Glenn Beck is a manipulative person.  Glenn Beck said something I disagree with.  Glenn Beck must be being manipulative."  Thus illustrated your argument is flawed because you are doing nothing more than assuming you know the outcome.  If you truly believe that you can read other people's minds, i.e. know their mental state, then we really have nothing more to talk about as our differences are so foundational as to be irreconcilable.
I just got my stickers in the mail today. Its gonna be a good weekend!
Without a doubt.
The Cubans (that still live there) that I met were trying to get into shape...seems they got kinda plump last few years.   And a vegetarian foodie that went there reported pretty lousy produce, over priced, to boot.  So I guess that they have enough food...but low quality?
You should be fine. A standard test covers 90 days: http://www.omegalabs.net/abouthairtesting/hairtestingfaq/hairtestingfaq.aspx  If you're still paranoid, search around for several shampoos that are made specifically for this purpose. The shampoos contain propylene glycol, which can help remove the cannabinoid metabolites from your hair.
GPS stands for Global Positioning System which is a global navigation satellite system (GNSS).  The GLONASS and the upcoming Galileo system are also examples of global navigation satellite systems.
http://www.mirror.co.uk/news/top-stories/2010/09/21/cat-woman-s-bin-charged-115875-22576519/
Being a stay at home dad is not the same thing is being rich and chilling at home.
Yeah, I have adblock and I never get ads on the dailyshow.com or colbert report. I do see promos for other CC shows, though. 
Did you see the MythBusters that featured the pirate eye patch? Evidently they were used when running into a darkened area while being chased by someone WITHOUT an eye patch. Just remove the patch and you have instant night vision while your pursuer is still trying to adjust his eyes to the dim light.
If his partner's testimony would have convicted him, and that partner refused to testify, then that does kinda mark both of them as pieces of shit. 
And when you've had enough, everyone is a friend
actually, it is only presumably tidally locked, simply because its so close, but the orbital parameters (eg eccentricity) are not fully known , and its  close to another planet in the system, so it might be some other orbital resonance.
This is great. I often see objections to "indoctrinating" children on reddit. Choosing not to "indoctrinate" a child is choosing not to teach any values. While my personal values may differ from the majority of the reddit community, I find the idea of "letting the child decide" what their values are rather silly. 
Always nice to know I caused a little nostalgia :)
Oh, I think I see whats going on... how big is the female joint on the ashcatcher aka the male on the downtube for the ashcatcher? is it unusually big? i think that threw me off, also didn't realize that was a carbon filter but i see the stones now, nice setup, i used to have one like it except with a dry system ashcatcher on top to keep the carbon from getting dumped on... i miss that piece
Plenty of great places to play in Cali.  Santa Cruz is great, so is Atascadero, Santa Maria, Golida, tons in LA including Huntington Beach.  San Diego only has 2 (maybe 3) but the one in Balboa Park (Morely Field) is awesome.
Yeah, that's my impression too. 
Wait, people wipe that way?  For reals?  I mean, yeah, I've seen women wipe their cooch after peeing, but that makes logistical sense.  I've never even considered that people would wipe their ass from between their legs.
fuck yes.  i'm gonna fuck my right hand then fucking murder it, then i'll
A canine quarterback is murdered, and returns as a millionaire, enlisting the help of an orphan girl to get revenge
Hi. My name is 'x' I'm bored with the feminist sites because they all agree and I'm looking for an argument. Please explain why you hate women, and justify your existence as men, and the existence of your mens board. I don't use bad lnaguage,I'm well educated, I just don't understand why you insist on having a mens board that speaks for men. After all everyone knows wymyn can do no wrong, and are always right. So insert your thesis here and satisfy my huge ego, and my need for attention,because as men you obviously have mental problems. (sarcasm) Troll. Yes.She-is-a-troll.
YES fucking Ginger tea- shit's tha bomb!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
